Maryland, session 2025, HB0504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 6–601 through 6–604 and the subtitle “Subtitle 6. Interstate Agreement on
– 3 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Qualifications of Educational Personnel” of Article – Education of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 19 of Chapter 36 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2021, as amended by
Chapter 55 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2021, be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the
Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–104.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of a county charter that places a limit on
that county’s property tax rate or revenues and subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a
county governing body may set a property tax rate that is higher than the rate authorized
under the county’s charter or collect more property tax revenues than the revenues authorized
under the county’s charter for the sole purpose of funding the approved budget of the county
board INCLUDING ANY PAYMENTS BY THE COUNTY GOVERNING BODY ON BEHALF OF
THE COUNTY BOARD TO THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM AND THE TEACHERS’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM.
(2) If the county governing body sets a county property tax rate that is
greater than the rate authorized under the county’s charter or collects more property tax
revenues than the revenues authorized under the county’s charter, the county:
(i) May not reduce funding provided to the county board from any
other local revenue source below the funding level in the current county budget; and
(ii) Shall appropriate to the county board all property tax revenues
exceeding the amount that would have been available if the county charter limitation had
applied.
(3) On or before December 31 of any year in which a county sets a property
tax rate as provided in this subsection, the county shall report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly, on the
property tax rate set, the additional amount of revenues generated, and the appropriation of
the additional revenues.
5–201.
(a) In this subtitle, except as otherwise provided, the following words have the
meanings indicated.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(s) “Target per pupil foundation amount” means:
(1) For fiscal year 2022, $7,991;
(2) For fiscal year 2023, $8,310;
(3) For fiscal year 2024, $8,642;
(4) For fiscal year 2025, $8,789;
(5) For fiscal year 2026, [$9,226] $9,063;
(6) For fiscal year 2027, [$9,732] $9,398 $9,561;
(7) For fiscal year 2028, [$10,138] $9,626 $9,789;
(8) For fiscal year 2029, [$10,564] $9,866 $10,200;
(9) For fiscal year 2030, [$11,004] $10,276 $10,625;
(10) For fiscal year 2031, [$11,442] $10,683 $11,047;
(11) For fiscal year 2032, [$11,898] $11,104 $11,483;
(12) For fiscal year 2033, [$12,365] $11,536 $11,931; [and]
(13) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2034, $12,381;
(14) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2035, $12,843; AND
(13) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2034, $11,946;
(14) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2035, $12,369;
(15) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2036, $12,808;
(16) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2037, $13,259; AND
[(13) (15)] (17) For subsequent fiscal years, the target per pupil
foundation amount for the prior fiscal year increased by the inflation adjustment rounded
to the nearest whole dollar.
5–206.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund.
– 5 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue distributed to the Fund under Title 9, Subtitles 1D and 1E of
the State Government Article and §§ 2–4A–02, 2–605.1, and 2–1303 of the Tax – General
Article;
(2) Money appropriated in the State budget for the Fund;
(3) INTEREST EARNED BY THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9.12–103 § 6–1105 OF THIS ARTICLE; and
[(3)] (4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(g) (2) (I) The Fund may not be used for school construction under Subtitle
3 of this title.
(II) THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED TO FUND THE ACADEMIC
EXCELLENCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 11 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
5–210.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND ESTIMATE” MEANS
THE ESTIMATE OF REVENUES TO BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY
THE BOARD OF REVENUE ESTIMATES AS REQUIRED BY § 6–106 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “GENERAL FUND ESTIMATE” MEANS THE ESTIMATE OF GENERAL
FUND REVENUES BY THE BOARD OF REVENUE ESTIMATES AS REQUIRED BY § 6–106
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(B) BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2024, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, IF THERE IS A
CUMULATIVE REDUCTION IN THE DECEMBER GENERAL FUND ESTIMATE AND THE
BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND ESTIMATE IN THE DECEMBER BOARD
OF REVENUE ESTIMATES REPORT FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR THAT IS AT LEAST 3.75%
BELOW THE MARCH GENERAL FUND ESTIMATE IN THE MARCH BOARD OF REVENUE
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
ESTIMATES REPORT FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW:
(1) PER PUPIL FORMULA INCREASES IN MAJOR EDUCATION AID
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE 0%; AND
(2) ANY ADDITIONAL FUNDING INCREASES REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIMITED TO 0%.
(C) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE THE LIMITATION ON INCREASES
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SESSION IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE DECEMBER
BOARD OF REVENUE ESTIMATES REPORT.
5–213.
(a) Each fiscal year, the State shall distribute the State share of the foundation
program to each county board.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, each fiscal year,
the county board shall distribute to each school the minimum school funding amount for
the foundation program calculated under § 5–234 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) Each county board shall distribute to the local workforce development
board for the county the following amount multiplied by the enrollment count in the county:
(i) For fiscal year 2024, $62; and
(ii) For each of fiscal years 2025 and 2026 FISCAL YEARS 2025
THROUGH 2028, the prior fiscal year amount increased by the inflation adjustment.
(2) The funds distributed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
used to support the Career Counseling Program for Middle and High School Students
established under § 7–126 § 7–127 of this article that is provided collaboratively by the
workforce development board, the school, any other relevant State or local agencies, and
employers.
(3) On or before June 30, 2024, and in each of the next 2 4 fiscal years, the
local workforce development board, in collaboration with the county board and any other
relevant State or local agencies, shall report to the Accountability and Implementation
Board established under Subtitle 4 of this title on the use of the funds and the impact of
the funds on providing career counseling.
(4) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
– 7 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON
THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CAREER COUNSELING PROGRAM FOR MIDDLE AND
HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS, INCLUDING:
(I) WHETHER CAREER COUNSELING SERVICES HAVE
ADEQUATELY PREPARED STUDENTS FOR POST–COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS
PATHWAYS, INCLUDING:
1. PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS WHO COMPLETED A
CAREER READINESS ASSESSMENT;
2. STUDENT SELF–REPORTED CONFIDENCE LEVELS IN
CAREER READINESS;
3. NUMBER OF STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN CAREER
COUNSELING SESSIONS AND COMPLETING A 6–YEAR CAREER PLAN BY THE END OF
8TH GRADE;
4. NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO PARTICIPATED IN
CAREER EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING FIELD TRIPS, COLLEGE OR TRAINING
CENTER VISITS, CAREER FAIRS, OR REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS;
5. NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO IDENTIFIED
POST–COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS PATHWAY PREFERENCES; AND
6. PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS APPLYING TO
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION, CAREER TRAINING PROGRAMS, OR REGISTERED
APPRENTICESHIPS;
(II) WHETHER STUDENTS HAVE RECEIVED HIGH–QUALITY
CAREER OPPORTUNITIES AS A RESULT OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
1. NUMBER OF STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIPS, INTERNSHIPS, JOB SHADOWING, OR OTHER
WORKPLACE OPPORTUNITIES FACILITATED BY THE PROGRAM;
2. EMPLOYER SATISFACTION RATINGS OF STUDENT
PREPAREDNESS AND PERFORMANCE;
3. NUMBER OF STUDENTS SECURING A REGISTERED
APPRENTICESHIP OR PART–TIME EMPLOYMENT RELATED TO THEIR FIELD OF
INTEREST AFTER ENGAGING WITH THE PROGRAM BEFORE GRADUATION; AND
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
4. NUMBER OF NEW EMPLOYER COLLABORATIONS EACH
YEAR; AND
(III) IDENTIFYING LONG–TERM METRICS FOR THE PROGRAM TO
DETERMINE THE PROGRAM’S EFFECTIVENESS IN GUIDING HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS
TOWARD SATISFACTORY CAREER PATHS AFTER COMPLETING HIGH SCHOOL,
INCLUDING CONSIDERATION OF:
1. EMPLOYMENT RATE OF PROGRAM GRADUATES
WITHIN 6 TO 12 MONTHS POST GRADUATION;
2. PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS EMPLOYED IN THEIR
FIELD OF INTEREST OR RELATED INDUSTRY WITHIN 1 YEAR OF GRADUATION;
3. STUDENT–REPORTED JOB SATISFACTION AND
CAREER ALIGNMENT BASED ON FOLLOW–UP SURVEYS;
4. COLLEGE PERSISTENCE AND COMPLETION RATES FOR
STUDENTS WHO PARTICIPATED IN THE PROGRAM; AND
5. REDUCTION IN THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO ARE
UNEMPLOYED OR NOT PARTICIPATING IN A POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION PROGRAM
COMPARED TO PRE–PROGRAM DATA.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “collaborative time per pupil amount” means:
(i) For fiscal year [2026] 2030, $163;
(ii) (I) For fiscal year [2027] 2031, $334;
(iii) (II) For fiscal year [2028] 2032, $512;
(iv) (III) For fiscal year [2029] 2033, $698;
(v) (IV) For fiscal year [2030] 2034, $891;
(vi) (V) For fiscal year [2031] 2035, $1,093;
(vii) (VI) For fiscal year [2032] 2036, $1,306;
(viii) (VII) For fiscal year [2033] 2037, $1,527; and
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, $334;
– 9 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, $512;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, $698;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, $891;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2033, $1,093;
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2034, $1,306;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2035, $1,527; AND
(ix) (VIII) For each fiscal year thereafter, the collaborative time per
pupil amount in the prior fiscal year increased by the inflation adjustment.
(2) The collaborative time per pupil amount multiplied by the enrollment
count in each county shall be distributed to and expended by schools in each county in
accordance with Title 6, Subtitle 10 of this article and the county’s collaborative time
implementation plan approved by the Accountability and Implementation Board.
5–222.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (I) [“Compensatory] FOR FISCAL YEARS 2022 THROUGH 2025,
“COMPENSATORY education per pupil amount” means the following proportions of the
target per pupil foundation amount:
[(i)] 1. For fiscal year 2022, 91%;
[(ii)] 2. For fiscal year 2023, 89%;
[(iii)] 3. For fiscal year 2024, 87%; AND
[(iv)] 4. For fiscal year 2025, 86%[;].
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, “COMPENSATORY
EDUCATION PER PUPIL AMOUNT” MEANS:
[(v)] 1. For fiscal year 2026, [85%] $7,842;
[(vi)] 2. For fiscal year 2027, [80%] $7,786;
[(vii)] 3. For fiscal year 2028, [78%] $7,908;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
[(viii)] 4. For fiscal year 2029, [76%] $8,029;
[(ix)] 5. For fiscal year 2030, [76%] $8,363;
[(x)] 6. For fiscal year 2031, [75%] $8,582;
[(xi)] 7. For fiscal year 2032, [71%] $8,448; [and]
[(xii)] 8. For fiscal year 2033 [and each fiscal year thereafter, 73%],
$9,026; AND
9. FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, THE
COMPENSATORY EDUCATION PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR
INCREASED BY THE INFLATION ADJUSTMENT ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST WHOLE
DOLLAR.
5–223.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community school” means a community school under Title 9.9 of this
article.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
“concentration of poverty level” means the average percentage of eligible students of the
school’s enrollment for the 3 prior school years rounded to the nearest whole percent.
(ii) If the 3 prior school years includes the 2020–2021 school year,
“concentration of poverty level” means:
1. The sum of the percentage of eligible students of the
school’s enrollment for the 4 prior school years minus the 2020–2021 school year percentage
of eligible students; divided by
2. Three; and
3. Rounded to the nearest whole percent.
(4) (i) “Eligible school” means:
1. For the personnel grant, a public school, including a public
charter school, with a concentration of poverty level of:
A. For fiscal year 2020, at least 80%;
B. For fiscal year 2021, at least 75%;
– 11 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. For fiscal year 2022, at least 70%;
D. For fiscal year 2023, at least 65%;
E. For fiscal year 2024, at least 60%; and
F. For fiscal year 2025, and each fiscal year thereafter, at
least 55%; and
2. For the per pupil grant, a public school, including a public
charter school, with a concentration of poverty level of:
A. For fiscal year 2022, at least 80%;
B. For fiscal year 2023, at least 75%;
C. For fiscal year 2024, at least 70%;
D. For fiscal year 2025, at least 65%;
E. For fiscal year 2026, at least 60%; and
F. For fiscal year 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, at
least 55%.
(ii) “Eligible school” includes an alternative option program in the
local school system if the students in the program are not included in the count of eligible
students for another program or school to determine eligibility for the concentration of
poverty grant.
(iii) “Eligible school” does not include a school that is eligible to
receive funding under this section but has closed.
(5) “Eligible student” means the compensatory education enrollment as
defined in § 5–222 of this subtitle in the second prior fiscal year rounded to the nearest
whole number.
(6) “Locally funded county” means a county board that receives a
compensatory education State share under § 5–221(c)(1)(ii) of this subtitle.
(7) “Needs assessment” means the assessment completed under § 9.9–104
of this article.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(8) “Per pupil grant amount” means, for all eligible schools in the county,
the per pupil amount for each eligible school calculated under subsection (d) of this section
multiplied by the number of eligible students in the school.
(9) “Per pupil maximum amount” means:
(i) For fiscal year 2022, $3,374.48; and
(ii) For each subsequent fiscal year, the prior fiscal year amount
increased by the inflation adjustment.
(10) “Program” means the Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program
established under this section.
(11) “Sliding scale adjustment factor” means:
(i) For fiscal year 2022, $7,422.33; and
(ii) For each subsequent fiscal year, the prior fiscal year amount
increased by the inflation adjustment.
(12) “Sliding scale upper limit” means:
(i) For fiscal year 2022, $13,495.15; and
(ii) For each subsequent fiscal year, the prior fiscal year amount
increased by the inflation adjustment.
(13) “State funded county” means a county that is not a locally funded
county.
(14) “Wraparound services” includes the wraparound services defined under
§ 9.9–101 of this article.
(b) (1) There is a Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program in the State.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to eligible schools with
a high concentration of eligible students.
(3) The Program consists of the:
(i) Personnel grant; and
(ii) Per pupil grant.
– 13 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) (i) [1.] For fiscal year 2022, the State shall distribute a personnel
grant to each county board equal to $248,833 for each eligible school in the county.
[2.] (II) In each subsequent fiscal year, the personnel grant
equals the personnel grant in the prior fiscal year increased by the inflation adjustment.
[(ii)] (III) Except as provided in [subparagraph (iii) of this
paragraph] SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, each county board shall distribute
directly to each eligible school the amount provided under paragraph (1)(i) AND (II) of this
subsection.
[(iii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, if a local school system has at least 40 eligible schools, the county board
may, on behalf of eligible schools, expend no more than 50% of the funds distributed by the
State under this paragraph, provided that a plan is developed in consultation with the
eligible schools that ensures that the requirements of paragraphs (2) through (8) of this
subsection are met and the plan is submitted to the Accountability and Implementation
Board in accordance with § 5–402 of this title.
2. Subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph does not apply
to a public charter school unless the public charter school chooses to participate in the
plan.]
(2) (i) Each eligible school shall employ one community school
coordinator staff position in the eligible school.
(ii) 1. Each eligible school shall provide full–time coverage by at
least one professional health care practitioner during school hours, including any extended
learning time, who is a licensed physician, a licensed physician’s assistant, or a licensed
registered nurse, practicing within the scope of the health care practitioner’s license.
2. A health care practitioner providing coverage under this
subparagraph may work under a school health services program, a county health
department, or a school–based health center.
3. This subparagraph may not be construed to:
A. Require that an eligible school hire a full–time health care
practitioner staff position; or
B. Preclude the hiring of any other health care practitioners
that meet the needs of the students.
(3) Each eligible school shall use the personnel grant to fund the
requirements under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(4) If the personnel grant provided to an eligible school exceeds the cost to
employ the positions and provide the coverage required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the eligible school may only use the excess funds to:
(i) Provide wraparound services to the students enrolled in the
eligible school;
(ii) Complete the needs assessment; and
(iii) In fiscal years 2021 through 2025, provide the requirements
under COMAR Title 13A, Subtitle 04, including 13A.04.16.01.
(5) (i) If an eligible school, prior to receiving a personnel grant, employs
an individual in a position or has the coverage required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, at least the same amount of funds shall be provided to the eligible school to be
used for those positions or coverage after receiving a personnel grant.
(ii) If an eligible school satisfies subparagraph (i) of this paragraph,
then the school shall use the personnel grant in accordance with paragraph (4) of this
subsection.
(6) The community school coordinator shall be subject to the requirements
under § 9.9–104 of this article.
(7) A county that provides a school nurse, school health services, or
community school services from funds outside of those made in the fiscal year 2019 local
appropriation to the county board shall continue to provide at least the same resources to
an eligible school through fiscal year 2030.
(8) If an eligible school becomes ineligible, the school shall remain entitled
to the personnel grant for two school years after the school loses eligibility but may not
receive the per pupil grant.
(9) The personnel and per pupil grant may be used through fiscal year 2027
to provide the programs required under COMAR Title 13A, Subtitle 04, including
13A.04.16.01.
(d) (1) (i) 1. Eligible schools with a concentration of poverty level of at
least 80% shall receive a per pupil grant beginning in fiscal year 2022.
2. All other eligible schools shall receive the per pupil grant
1 year after becoming eligible and on completion of the needs assessment required under §
9.9–104 of this article.
– 15 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, each
eligible school shall receive a per pupil grant each fiscal year equal to the product of the
total number of eligible students in the school and the per pupil amount based on the sliding
scale under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) (i) The sliding scale per pupil amount shall be calculated as
provided in this paragraph.
(ii) For schools with a concentration of poverty level less than or
equal to 55%, the per pupil amount is $0.
(iii) For schools with a concentration of poverty level greater than
55% but less than 80%, the per pupil amount is equal to the product of the concentration of
poverty level and the sliding scale upper limit minus the sliding scale adjustment factor.
(iv) For schools with a concentration of poverty level equal to or
greater than 80% the per pupil amount is the maximum per pupil amount.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph [(4)] (5) of this subsection, each
eligible school shall receive the following proportion of the per pupil grant calculated under
paragraph (2) of this subsection rounded to the nearest whole dollar:
(i) For the 1st year of eligibility, 16%;
(ii) For the 2nd year of eligibility, 32%;
(iii) For the 3rd year of eligibility, 37%;
(iv) For the 4th year of eligibility, 55%;
(v) For the 5th year of eligibility, 66%;
(vi) For the 6th year of eligibility, 75%; and
(vii) For the 7th year of eligibility and each year of eligibility
thereafter, 100%.
(4) (I) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, INCREASES IN THE
PROPORTION OF THE PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR EACH ELIGIBLE SCHOOL
CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PAUSE AT THE
PROPORTION ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS RECEIVED IN FISCAL YEAR 2026.
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE INCREASES IN THE
PROPORTION OF THE PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR EACH ELIGIBLE SCHOOL SHALL
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
RESUME BASED ON THE AMOUNT THE ELIGIBLE SCHOOL WOULD HAVE RECEIVED IN
FISCAL YEAR 2027 AS CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(4)] (5) Beginning in fiscal year [2030] 2032, each eligible school shall
receive 100% of the per pupil grant calculated under paragraph (2) of this subsection
rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(e) (1) For a locally funded county each fiscal year, the State shall distribute
the State share of the per pupil grant amount to each county board.
(2) For a State funded county:
(i) The State shall distribute 100% of the per pupil grant amount to
each county board; and
(ii) There is no local share of the per pupil grant amount.
(3) Each fiscal year, the county board shall distribute to each school the
minimum school funding amount for the per pupil grant amount calculated under § 5–234
of this subtitle.
(f) (1) [Each] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, EACH eligible school shall use the per pupil grant to provide wraparound
services and other programs and services identified in the eligible school’s needs
assessment plan.
(2) [(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if a
local school system has at least 40 eligible schools, the county board may, on behalf of the
eligible schools, expend no more than 50% of the funds distributed for the per pupil grant,
provided that a plan is developed in consultation with the eligible schools that ensures that
the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection are met and the plan is submitted to
the Accountability and Implementation Board under § 5–402 of this title.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does not apply to a public
charter school unless the public charter school chooses to participate in the plan.
(3)] A local school system may request flexibility in distributing funds
through [the Accountability and Implementation Board appeal process under § 5–406 of
this title] AN APPEALS PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(g) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
HAS AT LEAST 2 10 ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS OR IF AT LEAST 35% OF A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM’S SCHOOLS ARE ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS:
– 17 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) THE COUNTY BOARD MAY, ON BEHALF OF THE ELIGIBLE
SCHOOLS, EXPEND NO MORE THAN 50% 40% 50% OF THE FUNDS DISTRIBUTED FOR
THE PROGRAM, PROVIDED THAT A PLAN IS DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION WITH
THE ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS THAT ENSURES THAT THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTIONS (C)(2) THROUGH (8) AND (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION ARE MET AND THE
PLAN, CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IN TITLE 9.9 OF THIS ARTICLE, IS
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) THE IN EXPENDING FUNDS ON BEHALF OF AN ELIGIBLE
SCHOOL A COUNTY BOARD MAY NOT EXPEND A PORTION OF THE SPEND FUNDS
DISTRIBUTED FOR THE PROGRAM ON CENTRAL ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS,
INCLUDING TO BUT MAY THAT DIRECTLY BENEFIT AN ELIGIBLE SCHOOL, INCLUDING
TO:
1. PROVIDE CENTRAL SUPPORT TO EFFECTIVELY
MANAGE PROGRAM FUNDS; PROVIDE CENTRAL SUPPORT TO EFFECTIVELY MANAGE
PROGRAM FUNDS;
2. 2. ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH OUTSIDE SERVICE
PROVIDERS THAT SUPPORT AT LEAST 2 ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS; AND
3. 2. 3. COORDINATE SPENDING ON BEHALF OF
ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
4. ANY OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE COST AS DEFINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT THROUGH REGULATION; AND
4. ANY OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE COST AS DEFINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT THROUGH REGULATION.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL UNLESS THE PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL CHOOSES TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PLAN.
(3) A COUNTY BOARD THAT EXPENDS FUNDS ON BEHALF OF ELIGIBLE
SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROVIDE
TO EACH ELIGIBLE SCHOOL:
(I) AN ITEMIZED LIST OF SERVICES PROVIDED FOR STUDENTS
AND THEIR FAMILIES THAT MEET THE NEEDS IDENTIFIED IN THE NEEDS
ASSESSMENT OF THE ELIGIBLE SCHOOL; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING SPENT ON EACH SERVICE; AND
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(III) THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING SPENT ON CENTRAL
ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE SCHOOL.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) BY JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
(H) On or before October 1, 2021, and each October 1 thereafter, the Department
shall submit to the Department of Budget and Management and the Department of
Legislative Services the percentage and number of students at each school eligible for free
or reduced price meals in the prior school year and each public school’s eligibility for a grant
under this program in the upcoming fiscal year.
[(h)] (I) (1) On or before August 15, 2025, and each August 15 thereafter,
each community school coordinator of an eligible school shall submit to the Department
[and the Accountability and Implementation Board] an evaluation that provides for the
immediately preceding school year for the community school coordinator’s eligible school:
(i) How funds provided under this section were allocated at the
beginning of the school year compared to how the funds were actually used;
(ii) The numbers of:
1. Students identified as needing wraparound services;
2. Students and families provided with wraparound services,
categorized by the type of service as described under § 9.9–101 of this article; and
3. Families, organizations, and community members who
volunteered at the eligible school;
(iii) The rates of:
1. Chronic absenteeism; and
2. Student disciplinary action; and
(iv) Strategies for reducing the rate of chronic absenteeism identified
under item (iii) of this paragraph.
(2) Each community school coordinator shall use the evaluation form
developed by the Director of Community Schools under § 9.9–103 of this article.
– 19 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The Department [and the Accountability and Implementation Board]
shall:
(i) [Make TRANSMIT THE FINAL REPORT TO THE
ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD AND MAKE] TRANSMIT THE FINAL
REPORT TO THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD AND MAKE
publicly available each evaluation submitted under this subsection; and
(ii) On or before December 1, 2024, jointly submit a report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
possible methods for ensuring that funds provided under this section are used
appropriately and effectively.
(4) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL CONDUCT A STATEWIDE EVALUATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT THE FINAL REPORT
SUMMARIZE THE RESULTS OF THE FINDINGS IN A REPORT THAT THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
1. TRANSMIT TO THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD AND MAKE THE REPORT;
2. SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
3. MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.
5–224.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (I) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2022 THROUGH 2025, “English learner per
pupil amount” means the following proportions of the target per pupil foundation amount:
[(i)] 1. For fiscal year 2022, 100%;
[(ii)] 2. For fiscal year 2023, 100%;
[(iii)] 3. For fiscal year 2024, 100%; AND
[(iv)] 4. For fiscal year 2025, 102%[;].
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, “ENGLISH LEARNER PER
PUPIL AMOUNT” MEANS:
[(v)] 1. For fiscal year 2026, [98%] $9,041;
[(vi)] 2. For fiscal year 2027, [94%] $9,148;
[(vii)] 3. For fiscal year 2028, [92%] $9,327;
[(viii)] 4. For fiscal year 2029, [91%] $9,613;
[(ix)] 5. For fiscal year 2030, [89%] $9,794;
[(x)] 6. For fiscal year 2031, [88%] $10,069;
[(xi)] 7. For fiscal year 2032, [86%] $10,232; [and]
[(xii)] 8. For fiscal year 2033 [and each fiscal year thereafter, 85%],
$10,510; AND
9. FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, THE ENGLISH
LEARNER PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR INCREASED BY THE
INFLATION ADJUSTMENT ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST WHOLE DOLLAR.
5–225.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Special education enrollment” means the number of students
enrolled in a public school in the prior fiscal year who required special education services as
defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
(ii) “Special education enrollment” includes special education
students enrolled in a publicly funded prekindergarten program under Title 7, Subtitle 1A
of this article.
(iii) “Special education enrollment” does not include students who are
enrolled in or attend:
1. The Maryland School for the Blind;
2. The Maryland School for the Deaf; or
3. An educational program operated by the State.
– 21 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (I) [“Special] FOR FISCAL YEARS 2022 THROUGH 2025,
“SPECIAL education per pupil amount” means the following proportions of the target per
pupil foundation amount:
[(i)] 1. For fiscal year 2022, 86%;
[(ii)] 2. For fiscal year 2023, 86%;
[(iii)] 3. For fiscal year 2024, 92%; AND
[(iv)] 4. For fiscal year 2025, 99%[;].
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, “SPECIAL EDUCATION
PER PUPIL AMOUNT” MEANS:
[(v)] 1. For fiscal year 2026, [103%] $9,503;
[(vi)] 2. For fiscal year 2027, [112%] $10,900;
[(vii)] 3. For fiscal year 2028, [122%] $12,368;
[(viii)] 4. For fiscal year 2029, [136%] $14,367;
[(ix)] 5. For fiscal year 2030, [153%] $16,836;
[(x)] 6. For fiscal year 2031, [151%] $17,277;
[(xi)] 7. For fiscal year 2032, [148%] $17,609; [and]
[(xii)] 8. For fiscal year 2033 [and each fiscal year thereafter,
146%], $18,053; AND
9. FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, THE SPECIAL
EDUCATION PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR INCREASED BY THE
INFLATION ADJUSTMENT ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST WHOLE DOLLAR.
(b) Each school shall use the funds provided under this section to provide the
services required by each student’s individualized education program or 504 plans.
(c) (1) Each fiscal year, the State shall distribute the State share for special
education to each county board.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(2) Each fiscal year, the county board shall distribute to each school or
publicly funded prekindergarten program the minimum school funding amount for special
education calculated under § 5–234 of this subtitle.
6–124.
(a) (1) The Department shall establish, in collaboration with the Accountability
and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of this article, a school leadership
training program for the State Superintendent, county superintendents, senior
instruction–related staff, members of the Accountability and Implementation Board,
members of the State Board, members of county boards, and school [principals] LEADERS.
(2) THE SCHOOL LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM CONSISTS OF TWO
COMPONENTS:
(I) THE SCHOOL SYSTEM LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM;
AND
(II) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY.
[(2) (i)] (B) (1) The following individuals shall complete the school
SYSTEM leadership training program:
[1.] (I) The State Superintendent;
[2.] (II) A county superintendent; and
[3.] (III) The chair and vice chair of the State Board, a county
board, and the Accountability and Implementation Board.
[(ii) The individuals described in paragraph (1) of this subsection not
required to complete the training under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph are, to the extent
practicable, encouraged to complete the school leadership training program.]
[(b)] (2) The school SYSTEM leadership training program shall BE:
[(1) Be:]
(i) For a duration of 12 months;
(ii) Cohort–based to encourage collaboration and shared learning,
including through regional gatherings of education leaders and other meetings when
appropriate;
– 23 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) To the extent practicable, job–embedded to allow for application
of knowledge and techniques;
(iv) Tailored to program participants using self–diagnostics and
school–level diagnostics;
(v) Evidence–based in accordance with the guidelines for the federal
Every Student Succeeds Act; [and]
(vi) Provided through both in–person and virtual sessions; and
[(2)] (VII) Include training on the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future, as
defined in § 5–401 of this article.
[(c)] (3) The school SYSTEM leadership training program shall include:
[(1)] (I) A review of education in the United States relative to countries
with top performing education systems and the implications of high performance for
students, the economic security of the United States, and quality of life;
[(2)] (II) A model for strategic thinking that will assist education leaders
to transform districts and redesign schools under their leadership;
[(3)] (III) Training to provide a working knowledge of research on how
students learn and the implications for instructional redesign, curriculum plans, and
professional learning;
[(4)] (IV) A research–based model for coaching school leaders and
instructional coaches;
[(5)] (V) A review of research regarding:
[(i)] 1. The benefits to students from access to high–quality and
diverse teachers;
[(ii)] 2. Methods to attract highly qualified teachers from diverse
backgrounds who reflect the demographics of the students they teach; and
[(iii)] 3. Best practices for teacher retention, including retention of
teachers from diverse backgrounds;
[(6)] (VI) Lessons in transformational leadership;
[(7)] (VII) A method for organizing schools to achieve high performance,
including:
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
[(i)] 1. Building instructional leadership teams;
[(ii)] 2. Implementing career ladders for teachers;
[(iii)] 3. Overseeing teacher induction and mentoring systems; and
[(iv)] 4. Identifying, recruiting, and retaining high–quality and
diverse school leaders;
[(8)] (VIII) Training to provide a deep understanding of standards–aligned
instructional systems;
[(9)] (IX) An overview of ethical leadership directly tied to the educational
leaders’ responsibility to drive equitable learning in their schools; and
[(10)] (X) A review of research regarding methods to attract and retain an
inclusive workforce.
(C) (1) (I) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS MAY COMPLETE THE
MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY:
1. SCHOOL PRINCIPALS;
2. SCHOOL ASSISTANT PRINCIPALS;
3. SCHOOL–BASED OR COUNTY BOARD LEADERS
INTERESTED IN DEVELOPING THE INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP SKILLS TO BECOME
AN EFFECTIVE SCHOOL PRINCIPAL OR ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL; AND
4. OTHER INDIVIDUALS THE DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY
BOARD DETERMINES COULD BENEFIT FROM THE ACADEMY.
(II) SCHOOL LEADERS WHO WORK IN OR ARE INTERESTED IN
TRANSFERRING TO A COMMUNITY SCHOOL OR A LOW–PERFORMING SCHOOL SHALL
BE GIVEN PRIORITY IN PARTICIPATING IN THE ACADEMY.
(2) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY:
(I) SHALL BE:
1. FOR A DURATION OF 12 MONTHS;
– 25 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. COHORT–BASED TO ENCOURAGE COLLABORATION
AND SHARED LEARNING;
3. TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, JOB–EMBEDDED TO
ALLOW FOR APPLICATION OF KNOWLEDGE AND TECHNIQUES;
4. TAILORED TO PARTICIPANTS USING
SELF–DIAGNOSTICS AND SCHOOL–LEVEL DIAGNOSTICS;
5. EVIDENCE–BASED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
GUIDELINES FOR THE FEDERAL EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT; AND
6. PROVIDED THROUGH BOTH IN–PERSON AND VIRTUAL
SESSIONS; AND
(II) SHALL INCLUDE TRAINING ON BEST PRACTICES AND
STRATEGIES USED BY HIGHLY EFFECTIVE SCHOOL LEADERS THAT WILL ENABLE
SCHOOL LEADERS TO IMPLEMENT COMPONENTS OF THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE, AS DEFINED IN § 5–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) STRATEGIC PLANNING AND CHANGE MANAGEMENT TO
TRANSFORM AND REDESIGN SCHOOLS;
(II) INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP, INCLUDING:
1. ALIGNMENT BETWEEN STANDARDS, ASSESSMENTS,
AND INTERNALIZING CURRICULUM;
2. LESSON OBSERVATIONS, PROVIDING FEEDBACK, AND
TEACHER COACHING; AND
3. DATA–INFORMED INSTRUCTION AND DRIVING
EQUITABLE LEARNING OUTCOMES ACROSS STUDENT GROUPS;
(III) BEST PRACTICES FOR FACILITATING PROFESSIONAL
LEARNING AMONG TEACHERS;
(IV) METHODS FOR RECRUITING AND RETAINING HIGHLY
QUALIFIED TEACHERS AND TEACHERS FROM DIVERSE BACKGROUNDS WHO REFLECT
THE DEMOGRAPHICS OF THE STUDENTS THEY TEACH;
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(V) A METHOD FOR ORGANIZING SCHOOLS TO ACHIEVE HIGH
PERFORMANCE, INCLUDING:
1. BUILDING INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP TEAMS;
2. UTILIZING TEACHERS ON THE CAREER LADDER; AND
3. MASTER SCHEDULING; AND
(VI) STRATEGIES FOR EFFECTIVE PEER MENTORSHIP.
(4) (I) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY MAY
INCLUDE A MENTORSHIP COMPONENT FOR PARTICIPANTS.
(II) EFFECTIVE SCHOOL LEADERS SHALL BE SELECTED TO
SERVE AS MENTORS.
(III) MENTORS MAY BE PAID A STIPEND TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
ACADEMY.
5–225.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Special education enrollment” means the number of students
enrolled in a public school in the prior fiscal year who required special education services
as defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
(ii) “Special education enrollment” includes special education
students enrolled in a publicly funded prekindergarten program under Title 7, Subtitle 1A
of this article.
(iii) “Special education enrollment” does not include students who are
enrolled in or attend:
1. The Maryland School for the Blind;
2. The Maryland School for the Deaf; or
3. An educational program operated by the State.
(3) (I) [“Special] FOR FISCAL YEARS 2022 THROUGH 2025,
“SPECIAL education per pupil amount” means the following proportions of the target per
pupil foundation amount:
– 27 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(i)] 1. For fiscal year 2022, 86%;
[(ii)] 2. For fiscal year 2023, 86%;
[(iii)] 3. For fiscal year 2024, 92%; AND
[(iv)] 4. For fiscal year 2025, 99%[;].
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026, “SPECIAL EDUCATION
PER PUPIL AMOUNT” MEANS THE FOLLOWING:
[(v)] 1. For fiscal year 2026, [103%] $9,503;
[(vi)] 2. For fiscal year 2027, [112%] $10,900;
[(vii)] 3. For fiscal year 2028, [122%] $12,368;
[(viii)] 4. For fiscal year 2029, [136%] $14,367;
[(ix)] 5. For fiscal year 2030, [153%] $16,836;
[(x)] 6. For fiscal year 2031, [151%] $17,277;
[(xi)] 7. For fiscal year 2032, [148%] $17,609; [AND]
[(xii)] 8. For fiscal year 2033 [and each fiscal year thereafter,
146%], $18,424; AND
9. FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, THE SPECIAL
EDUCATION PER PUPIL AMOUNT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR INCREASED BY THE
INFLATION ADJUSTMENT ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST WHOLE DOLLAR.
(b) Each school shall use the funds provided under this section to provide the
services required by each student’s individualized education program or 504 plans.
(c) (1) Each fiscal year, the State shall distribute the State share for special
education to each county board.
(2) Each fiscal year, the county board shall distribute to each school or
publicly funded prekindergarten program the minimum school funding amount for special
education calculated under § 5–234 of this subtitle.
6–123.1.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GRANT” MEANS THE COLLABORATIVE TIME
INNOVATION DEMONSTRATION GRANT.
(B) (1) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 THROUGH 2029, THERE IS A
COLLABORATIVE TIME INNOVATION DEMONSTRATION GRANT.
(2) (I) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT IS TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO
ESTABLISH INNOVATIVE MODELS THAT CAN BE REPLICATED FOR TEACHER
COLLABORATION AT THE SCHOOL OR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM LEVEL THAT IMPROVE
TEACHER RETENTION AND STUDENT LEARNING.
(II) INNOVATIVE MODELS MAY INCLUDE ELEMENTS, IN WHOLE
OR IN PART, OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. A TEAM–BASED, EXPERT–LED STRUCTURE IN WHICH
EDUCATORS SHARE THE WORK OF PLANNING FOR INSTRUCTION AND THE
PROVISION OF STUDENT SUPPORTS, EDUCATING, AND SUPPORTING STUDENTS;
2. REDUCED WORKLOADS AND OPPORTUNITIES TO
LEARN AND PRACTICE FOR NEW TEACHERS, TEACHERS IN LOW–PERFORMING
SCHOOLS, AND TEACHERS IN SCHOOLS RECEIVING THE CONCENTRATION OF
POVERTY GRANT, GRADUALLY INCREASING TO FULL TEACHING RESPONSIBILITIES;
3. MODIFIED TEACHING SCHEDULES THAT ALLOW TIME
FOR REFLECTION, COLLABORATION, AND STUDENT CONNECTIONS;
4. MEANINGFUL LEADERSHIP OPPORTUNITIES FOR
EFFECTIVE, EXPERIENCED TEACHERS TO GROW IN THEIR CAREERS, EXTEND THEIR
IMPACT, AND INCREASE THEIR COMPENSATION IN ALIGNMENT WITH THE CAREER
LADDER; OR
5. FLEXIBLE SCHEDULES AND STAFFING PLANS THAT
ALLOW FOR ADDITIONAL INSTRUCTIONAL TIME OR SMALLER GROUP SETTINGS FOR
STUDENTS WHO NEED IT MOST.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT.
(4) ALLOWABLE USES OF GRANT FUNDS INCLUDE:
(I) COMPENSATION FOR ADDITIONAL STAFF TO SUPPORT
TEACHER RELEASE TIME;
– 29 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) PLANNING RELATED TO A NEW MASTER SCHEDULE AND
TEACHER STAFFING ASSIGNMENTS;
(III) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT;
(IV) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FROM AN APPROVED VENDOR;
(V) COSTS INVOLVED WITH INCREASED INTERACTIONS
BETWEEN TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL PERSONNEL TO BENEFIT STUDENTS; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER USE APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) (1) (I) A COUNTY BOARD MAY SUBMIT A PROPOSAL TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT TO ESTABLISH AN INNOVATIVE MODEL THAT
FURTHERS THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT.
(II) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT, AN APPLICATION MUST BE
SUBMITTED WITH A COSIGNED AGREEMENT FROM THE COUNTY BOARD’S LOCAL
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS DEFINED UNDER § 6–401 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) ONLY APPLICATIONS FOR NEW PROGRAMS NOT ALREADY IN
PLACE AT THE SCHOOL OR SYSTEM LEVEL ARE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FUNDS.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED INNOVATIVE MODEL;
(II) A FINANCIAL PLAN THAT DETAILS THE ESTIMATED TOTAL
COST, INCLUDING ANY ONE–TIME COSTS, OF IMPLEMENTING THE PROPOSED
INNOVATIVE MODEL;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE GOALS AND METRICS USED TO
EVALUATE THE EFFICACY OF THE GRANT AND INNOVATIVE MODEL; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PROCESSES AND
PROCEDURES FOR ACCEPTING AND EVALUATING APPLICATIONS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE PLANNING GRANTS BEFORE
AWARDING DEMONSTRATION GRANTS.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, DIVERSITY AMONG THE GRANTEES FOR THE FOLLOWING
CATEGORIES:
(I) GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION IN THE STATE;
(II) SIZE OF THE SCHOOL AND LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(III) SCHOOL GRADE BAND TO INCLUDE A MIX OF ELEMENTARY,
MIDDLE, AND HIGH SCHOOLS.
(6) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE
INITIAL GRANT AWARDS.
(7) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT AN EVALUATION OF EACH
GRANT AWARD TO DETERMINE WHETHER TO RECOMMEND THAT ONE OR MULTIPLE
INNOVATIVE MODELS BE CONSIDERED AS A BEST PRACTICE TO BE REPLICATED.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT AN INTERIM REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON
THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE GRANT AWARDS AND WHICH INNOVATIVE MODELS
HAVE DEMONSTRATED THE MOST SIGNIFICANT SUCCESS IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSE OF THE GRANT.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT A FINAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE GRANT AWARDS.
6–124.
(a) (1) The Department shall establish, in collaboration with the
Accountability and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of this article, a school
leadership training program for the State Superintendent, county superintendents, senior
instruction–related staff, members of the Accountability and Implementation Board,
members of the State Board, members of county boards, and school [principals] LEADERS.
(2) THE SCHOOL LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM CONSISTS OF TWO
COMPONENTS:
– 31 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) THE SCHOOL SYSTEM LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM;
AND
(II) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY.
[(2) (i)] (B) (1) The following individuals shall complete the school
system leadership training program:
[1.] (I) The State Superintendent;
[2.] (II) A county superintendent; and
[3.] (III) The chair and vice chair of the State Board, a county
board, and the Accountability and Implementation Board.
[(ii) The individuals described in paragraph (1) of this subsection not
required to complete the training under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph are, to the
extent practicable, encouraged to complete the school leadership training program.]
[(b)] (2) The school system leadership training program shall be:
[(1) Be:]
(i) For a duration of 12 months;
(ii) Cohort–based to encourage collaboration and shared learning,
including through regional gatherings of education leaders and other meetings when
appropriate;
(iii) To the extent practicable, job–embedded to allow for application
of knowledge and techniques;
(iv) Tailored to program participants using self–diagnostics and
school–level diagnostics;
(v) Evidence–based in accordance with the guidelines for the federal
Every Student Succeeds Act; [and]
(vi) Provided through both in–person and virtual sessions; and
[(2)] (VII) Include training on the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future, as
defined in § 5–401 of this article.
[(c)] (3) The school system leadership training program shall include:
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
[(1)] (I) A review of education in the United States relative to countries
with top performing education systems and the implications of high performance for
students, the economic security of the United States, and quality of life;
[(2)] (II) A model for strategic thinking that will assist education leaders
to transform districts and redesign schools under their leadership;
[(3)] (III) Training to provide a working knowledge of research on how
students learn and the implications for instructional redesign, curriculum plans, and
professional learning;
[(4)] (IV) A research–based model for coaching school leaders and
instructional coaches;
[(5)] (V) A review of research regarding:
[(i)] 1. The benefits to students from access to high–quality and
diverse teachers;
[(ii)] 2. Methods to attract highly qualified teachers from diverse
backgrounds who reflect the demographics of the students they teach; and
[(iii)] 3. Best practices for teacher retention, including retention of
teachers from diverse backgrounds;
[(6)] (VI) Lessons in transformational leadership;
[(7)] (VII) A method for organizing schools to achieve high performance,
including:
[(i)] 1. Building instructional leadership teams;
[(ii)] 2. Implementing career ladders for teachers;
[(iii)] 3. Overseeing teacher induction and mentoring systems; and
[(iv)] 4. Identifying, recruiting, and retaining high–quality and
diverse school leaders;
[(8)] (VIII) Training to provide a deep understanding of standards–aligned
instructional systems;
– 33 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(9)] (IX) An overview of ethical leadership directly tied to the educational
leaders’ responsibility to drive equitable learning in their schools; and
[(10)] (X) A review of research regarding methods to attract and retain an
inclusive workforce.
(C) (1) (I) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS MAY COMPLETE THE
MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY:
1. SCHOOL PRINCIPALS;
2. SCHOOL ASSISTANT PRINCIPALS;
3. SCHOOL–BASED OR COUNTY BOARD LEADERS
INTERESTED IN DEVELOPING THE INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP SKILLS TO BECOME
AN EFFECTIVE SCHOOL PRINCIPAL OR ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL; AND
4. OTHER INDIVIDUALS THE DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY
BOARD DETERMINES COULD BENEFIT FROM THE ACADEMY.
(II) SCHOOL LEADERS WHO WORK IN OR ARE INTERESTED IN
TRANSFERRING TO A COMMUNITY SCHOOL OR A LOW–PERFORMING SCHOOL SHALL
BE GIVEN PRIORITY IN PARTICIPATING IN THE ACADEMY.
(2) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY SHALL BE:
(I) FOR A DURATION OF 12 MONTHS;
(II) COHORT–BASED TO ENCOURAGE COLLABORATION AND
SHARED LEARNING;
(III) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, JOB–EMBEDDED TO ALLOW
FOR APPLICATION OF KNOWLEDGE AND TECHNIQUES;
(IV) TAILORED TO PARTICIPANTS USING SELF–DIAGNOSTICS
AND SCHOOL–LEVEL DIAGNOSTICS;
(V) EVIDENCE–BASED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GUIDELINES
FOR THE FEDERAL EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT;
(VI) PROVIDED THROUGH BOTH IN–PERSON AND VIRTUAL
SESSIONS; AND
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(VII) INCLUDE TRAINING ON BEST PRACTICES AND STRATEGIES
USED BY HIGHLY EFFECTIVE SCHOOL LEADERS THAT WILL ENABLE SCHOOL
LEADERS TO IMPLEMENT COMPONENTS OF THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE, AS DEFINED IN § 5–401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) STRATEGIC PLANNING AND CHANGE MANAGEMENT TO
TRANSFORM AND REDESIGN SCHOOLS;
(II) INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP, INCLUDING:
1. ALIGNMENT BETWEEN STANDARDS, ASSESSMENTS,
AND INTERNALIZING CURRICULUM;
2. LESSON OBSERVATIONS, PROVIDING FEEDBACK, AND
TEACHER COACHING; AND
3. DATA–INFORMED INSTRUCTION AND DRIVING
EQUITABLE LEARNING OUTCOMES ACROSS STUDENT GROUPS;
(III) BEST PRACTICES FOR FACILITATING PROFESSIONAL
LEARNING AMONG TEACHERS;
(IV) METHODS FOR RECRUITING AND RETAINING HIGHLY
QUALIFIED TEACHERS AND TEACHERS FROM DIVERSE BACKGROUNDS WHO
REFLECT THE DEMOGRAPHICS OF THE STUDENTS THEY TEACH;
(V) A METHOD FOR ORGANIZING SCHOOLS TO ACHIEVE HIGH
PERFORMANCE, INCLUDING:
1. BUILDING INSTRUCTIONAL LEADERSHIP TEAMS;
2. UTILIZING TEACHERS ON THE CAREER LADDER; AND
3. MASTER SCHEDULING; AND
(VI) STRATEGIES FOR EFFECTIVE PEER MENTORSHIP.
(4) (I) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY MAY
INCLUDE A MENTORSHIP COMPONENT FOR PARTICIPANTS.
– 35 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) EFFECTIVE SCHOOL LEADERS SHALL BE SELECTED TO
SERVE AS MENTORS.
(III) MENTORS MAY BE PAID A STIPEND TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
ACADEMY.
6–130.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ESTABLISH A NATIONAL
TEACHER RECRUITMENT CAMPAIGN TO BRING LICENSED AND PROSPECTIVE
TEACHERS TO THE STATE.
(2) THE CAMPAIGN SHALL END ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE CAMPAIGN IS TO BRING LICENSED AND
PROSPECTIVE TEACHERS TO THE STATE TO REDUCE THE NUMBER OF
CONDITIONALLY LICENSED TEACHERS AND MEET THE STATE’S TEACHER
WORKFORCE NEEDS TO IMPLEMENT COLLABORATIVE TIME.
(B) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT
WITH A NATIONAL EDUCATION NONPROFIT THAT HAS EXPERIENCE IN GUIDING
OTHER STATE EDUCATION AGENCIES IN TARGETED, STATE–BASED RECRUITMENT
CAMPAIGNS.
(2) THE ENTITY SELECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SUPPORT THE DEPARTMENT IN THE DESIGN,
IMPLEMENTATION, AND EVALUATION OF THE CAMPAIGN, INCLUDING THE
DEVELOPMENT OF MARKETING MATERIALS AND PROCESSES TO HELP INTERESTED
TEACHER CANDIDATES TO BECOME A TEACHER IN THE STATE.
(3) THE ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE ONE–TO–ONE MENTORING AND
SUPPORT SERVICES TO PROSPECTIVE CANDIDATES AT NO COST TO THE CANDIDATE.
(4) THE CAMPAIGN SHALL INCLUDE PUBLIC SERVICE
ANNOUNCEMENT ADVERTISING, DIGITAL MARKETING, AND DIRECT OUTREACH TO
ENCOURAGE CANDIDATES TO TEACH IN THE STATE.
6–131.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GRANT” MEANS THE MARYLAND TEACHER
RELOCATION INCENTIVE GRANT.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND TEACHER RELOCATION INCENTIVE
GRANT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT IS TO PROVIDE UP TO $2,000 IN
REIMBURSEMENT TO PARTIALLY OFFSET THE COST FOR TO INCENTIVIZE AN
OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED TEACHER TO MOVE TO THE STATE TO ADDRESS IN ORDER
TO:
(I) ADDRESS THE STATE’S TEACHER WORKFORCE SHORTAGE
AND REDUCE; AND
(II) REDUCE THE NUMBER OF CONDITIONALLY LICENSED
TEACHERS IN CLASSROOMS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT.
(4) GRANTS MAY NOT BE AWARDED AFTER JUNE 30, 2029.
(C) (1) (I) A COUNTY BOARD MAY SUBMIT A PROPOSAL TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT FOR A CANDIDATE.
(II) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT, A CANDIDATE SHALL:
1. HAVE A SIGNED CONTRACT TO TEACH IN A PUBLIC
SCHOOL IN THE STATE;
2. BE RECOGNIZED AS A LICENSED TEACHER IN A
PUBLIC KINDERGARTEN, ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, OR HIGH SCHOOL IN ANOTHER
STATE TO PROVIDE INSTRUCTION IN A SPECIFIC SUBJECT AREA, GRADE LEVEL, OR
FOR A SPECIFIC STUDENT POPULATION;
3. HOLD AN UNENCUMBERED LICENSE THAT IS NOT
RESTRICTED, PROBATIONARY, PROVISIONAL, TEMPORARY, OR IN ANY WAY SERVES
AS A SUBSTITUTE FOR FULLY LICENSED TEACHERS IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
4. AGREE TO TEACH IN A SCHOOL THAT HAS RECEIVED
FUNDING UNDER § 5–223 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS AFTER RECEIVING
THE GRANT.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) ITEMIZED RECORDS OF EXPENSES THE CANDIDATE
INCURRED DURING THE MOVE;
– 37 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) (I) A COPY OF THE TEACHER’S LICENSE HELD BY THE
CANDIDATE;
(III) (II) A COPY OF THE SIGNED CONTRACT BETWEEN THE
CANDIDATE AND THE COUNTY BOARD; AND
(IV) (III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PROCESSES AND
PROCEDURES FOR ACCEPTING AND EVALUATING APPLICATIONS.
(4) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
MAKE INITIAL GRANT AWARDS.
(D) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT
A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE GRANT AWARDS, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE NUMBER OF GRANT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED;
(2) THE NUMBER OF GRANTS AWARDED; AND
(3) THE NUMBER OF OUT–OF–STATE TEACHERS RECRUITED TO THE
STATE AFTER THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE GRANT.
6–1002.
(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2024, each county board shall implement a career
ladder that meets the requirements of this subtitle.
(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, teachers at each level or tier
of the career ladder shall teach in the classroom for a minimum percentage of their total
working time, as specified in this subtitle.
(2) The percentages referenced in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
become effective in phases over an 8–year A 7–YEAR period beginning July 1, [2025] 2029
2026 2028, as specified by a county board on approval of the State Board.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(3) The following teachers shall be given priority for working time outside
the classroom as the percentages referenced in paragraph (1) of this subsection are phased
in:
(i) Newly licensed teachers, particularly new teachers in
low–performing schools or schools that have a high concentration of students living in
poverty; and
(ii) Teachers in schools that:
1. Are low–performing;
2. Have a high concentration of students living in poverty; or
3. Have large achievement gaps between subpopulations of
students.
SUBTITLE 11. ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
6–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COORDINATOR OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE
OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO:
(1) IS A LICENSED EDUCATOR;
(2) DEVELOPS AND FACILITATES PROFESSIONAL LEARNING
OPPORTUNITIES FOR EDUCATORS AND ADMINISTRATORS IN THE STATE; AND
(3) AIMS TO IMPLEMENT EVIDENCE–BASED INSTRUCTIONAL
PRACTICES IN THOSE ASSISTED ASSISTS ADMINISTRATORS IN IMPLEMENTING
EVIDENCE–BASED INSTRUCTIONAL PRACTICES.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
(D) “INSTRUCTIONAL COACH” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM WHO:
(1) IS A LICENSED EDUCATOR;
– 39 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) PROVIDES COACHING TO TEACHERS AND OTHER EDUCATION
PROFESSIONALS TO IMPROVE INSTRUCTION; AND
(3) HELPS EDUCATORS INTEGRATE EVIDENCE–BASED PRACTICES
INTO THEIR PEDAGOGY.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
(F) “REGIONAL PROJECT MANAGER” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
DEPARTMENT WHO OVERSEES INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES AND COORDINATORS OF
PROFESSIONAL LEARNING IN A PARTICULAR DESIGNATED REGION.
6–1102.
(A) THERE IS AN ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ADDRESS CRITICAL ACADEMIC
NEEDS IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND ENSURE THAT MARYLAND STUDENTS HAVE
EQUITABLE ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY INSTRUCTION AND TARGETED ACADEMIC
SUPPORT BY:
(1) PROVIDING DIRECT COACHING SUPPORT TO TEACHERS AND
ADMINISTRATORS;
(2) GUARANTEEING ENSURING THAT THE COACHING SUPPORT IS
CONSISTENTLY CONDUCTED IN A MANNER THAT RESEARCH HAS DETERMINED
SHOWN IS LIKELY TO RESULT IN POSITIVE STUDENT OUTCOMES; AND
(3) DELIVERING TARGETED PROFESSIONAL LEARNING
OPPORTUNITIES FOR EDUCATORS AND ADMINISTRATORS TO IMPLEMENT
EVIDENCE–BASED INSTRUCTIONAL PRACTICES.
(C) (1) UNDER THE PROGRAM, INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES AND
COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING SHALL PROVIDE EDUCATORS IN
SELECTED SCHOOLS WITH:
(I) COACHING TO IMPROVE INSTRUCTION AND THE
INTEGRATION OF EVIDENCE–BASED PRACTICES INTO THE CLASSROOM; AND
(II) ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY, JOB–EMBEDDED, AND
SUSTAINED TARGETED PROFESSIONAL LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES.
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(2) UNDER THE PROGRAM, REGIONAL PROJECT PROGRAM
MANAGERS SHALL OVERSEE AND COORDINATE THE ACTIVITY OF INSTRUCTIONAL
COACHES AND COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING IN A DESIGNATED
REGION TO ENSURE THAT LOCAL NEEDS ARE CONSIDERED AND MET.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENTER INTO A COOPERATIVE AGREEMENT
WITH A COUNTY BOARD THAT ELECTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(E) (1) USING ACCOUNTABILITY DATA, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
COLLABORATION WITH PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS, SHALL IDENTIFY
THE SCHOOLS THAT ARE MOST IN NEED OF SUPPORT FROM THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE SELECTING SCHOOLS
WITH:
(I) LOW LOW PROFICIENCY RATES; AND
(II) SCHOOLS THAT HAVE SEEN DECLINING DECLINING
ACHIEVEMENT RESULTS IN RECENT YEARS WHEN SELECTING SCHOOLS FOR THE
PROGRAM.
(3) WITHIN A SELECTED SCHOOL, ADMINISTRATORS SHALL WORK
WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO IDENTIFY THE TEACHERS AND OTHER EDUCATORS WHO
WILL BENEFIT MOST FROM THE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES
PROVIDED BY INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES.
(F) (1) DURING FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027, THE PROGRAM SHALL
FOCUS ON EARLY LITERACY INSTRUCTION AND SUPPORT OF ELEMENTARY SCHOOL
EDUCATORS.
(2) IN SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, THE PROGRAM SHALL EXPAND
ITS FOCUS TO INCORPORATE OTHER EDUCATIONAL ACADEMIC TOPICS AND OTHER
GRADE LEVELS, WITH PARTICULAR ATTENTION PAID TO FOUNDATIONAL
MATHEMATICS INSTRUCTION.
6–1103.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP CRITERIA FOR THE
SELECTION OF INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES.
(2) AT A MINIMUM THE SELECTION CRITERIA SHALL INCLUDE:
– 41 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) METHODS TO IDENTIFY HIGHLY QUALIFIED EDUCATORS
WITH EXPERTISE IN THE INSTRUCTIONAL TOPIC AND GRADE LEVEL FOR WHICH THE
EDUCATOR WILL BE PROVIDING COACHING; AND
(II) A MEANS TO ASSESS THE CAPACITY POTENTIAL OF AN
EDUCATOR FOR LEADERSHIP AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT THROUGH
COACHING.
(3) A REGIONAL PROJECT PROGRAM MANAGER, IN COORDINATION
WITH A PARTICIPATING COUNTY BOARD, SHALL USE THE DEPARTMENT’S CRITERIA
TO SELECT INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A TRAINING PLAN FOR
INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES THAT PROVIDES EACH INSTRUCTIONAL COACH WITH THE
TOOLS TO SUPPORT EDUCATORS USING RESEARCH–BASED STRATEGIES TAILORED
TO THE NEEDS OF EACH EDUCATOR AND THE EDUCATOR’S STUDENTS.
(2) EACH INSTRUCTIONAL COACH SHALL BE TRAINED USING THE
DEPARTMENT’S TRAINING PLAN.
(C) AN INSTRUCTIONAL COACH SHALL OVERSEE EDUCATORS AT TWO TO
FOUR DIFFERENT PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN WHICH THE
COACH WORKS.
(D) AN INSTRUCTIONAL COACH SHALL SUPPORT EDUCATORS BY
PROVIDING JOB–EMBEDDED FEEDBACK DESIGNED TO:
(1) LEAD TO LONG–TERM INSTRUCTIONAL IMPROVEMENT;
(2) CREATE ASSIST AN EDUCATOR IN CREATING A PEDAGOGY THAT IS
INDIVIDUALLY TAILORED TO MEET THE NEEDS OF EACH STUDENT, REGARDLESS OF
THE STUDENT’S LINGUISTIC STATUS, DISABILITY STATUS, OR BACKGROUND; AND
(3) HELP CLOSE CLOSE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT GAPS.
6–1104.
(A) (1) THE UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EMPLOY
REGIONAL PROJECT PROGRAM MANAGERS THROUGH THE PROGRAM TO OVERSEE
THE WORK OF INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES.
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(2) EACH REGIONAL PROJECT PROGRAM MANAGER SHALL ENSURE
THAT INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES ARE MEETING LOCAL EDUCATOR AND STUDENT
NEEDS AND WORKING IN ALIGNMENT WITH STATE PRIORITIES, INCLUDING THE
PRINCIPLES FOR THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE.
(3) REGIONAL PROGRAM MANAGERS SHALL SUPPORT
INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES BY PROVIDING:
(I) EVIDENCE–BASED TOOLS AND STRATEGIES AND
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT MATERIALS;
(II) AN ANALYSIS OF EDUCATOR PRACTICES AND STUDENT
OUTCOMES TO ENSURE THAT INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES PROVIDE SUPPORT IN A
TARGETED MANNER;
(III) ASSISTANCE WITH FAMILY AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT;
AND
(IV) GUIDANCE TO ENSURE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT IS
RESEARCH–BASED AND DESIGNED TO REFLECT THE DIVERSE LINGUISTIC AND
CULTURAL NEEDS OF STUDENTS IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
EMPLOY COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING THROUGH THE PROGRAM.
(2) A COORDINATOR OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TO
EDUCATORS AND ADMINISTRATORS IN A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM BY ESTABLISHING
LEARNING MODULES AND THROUGH THE USE OF APPROPRIATE TOOLS AND
PLATFORMS; AND
(II) AND COLLABORATE COLLABORATE WITH ADMINISTRATORS
TO COLLECT DATA IN ORDER TO CREATE A PROFESSIONAL LEARNING PLAN THAT
FITS ALIGNS WITH THE NEEDS OF A SCHOOL.
(3) A COORDINATOR OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING SHALL ESTABLISH
LEARNING MODULES AND OTHER TOOLS AND PLATFORMS TO PROVIDE
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES TO ALL EDUCATORS IN A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM.
6–1105.
– 43 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) THERE IS AN ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ADDRESS
CRITICAL ACADEMIC NEEDS IN SCHOOLS, PARTICULARLY THOSE IDENTIFIED AS
LOW–PERFORMING.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) (I) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) 1. MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO
THE FUND; AND
(II) 2. ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE
ACCEPTED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(II) MONEY FROM THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THIS ARTICLE MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED
INTO THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR GRANTS TO COUNTY BOARDS,
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, OR OTHER
ENTITIES FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
(I) CONTRACTS WITH VENDORS TO PROVIDE SERVICES;
(II) TRAINING AND WORKSHOPS;
(III) PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION;
(IV) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE PROGRAM;
(V) PROGRAM EVALUATION AND REPORTING; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER COSTS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND UNDER § 5–206 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(8) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FOLLOWING DATA:
(1) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY DISBURSED FROM THE FUND,
DISAGGREGATED BY COUNTY; AND
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SCHOOLS SERVED BY THE FUND.
6–1106.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS TITLE.
7–447.1.
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Consortium on Coordinated Community Supports
in the Commission.
(p) (1) In this subsection, “Fund” means the Coordinated Community Supports
Partnership Fund.
(3) The purpose of the Fund is to support the delivery of services and
supports provided to students to meet their holistic behavioral health needs and address
other related challenges.
(9) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill the following
appropriations for the Fund:
(i) $25,000,000 in fiscal year 2022;
(ii) $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2023;
(iii) $85,000,000 in fiscal year 2024; AND
(iv) [$110,000,000 $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2025; and
– 45 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(v) $130,000,000] $40,000,000 $70,000,000 in fiscal year [2026]
2025; AND
(VI) $100,000,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 and each fiscal year
thereafter.
8–313.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Growth in the target per pupil foundation amount” means:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, 4.97%;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, 5.48%;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, 4.17%;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, 4.20%;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, 4.17%;
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, 3.98%;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, 3.99%;
(VIII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2033, 3.93%; AND
(IX) FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, the change in the per pupil
amount from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year divided by the per pupil amount
from the prior fiscal year.
(5) “Target per pupil foundation amount” means the figure calculated for
each fiscal year by the Department in accordance with [§ 5–202] § 5–201 of this article.
8–3A–09.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Growth in the target per pupil foundation amount” means:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, 4.97%;
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, 5.48%;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, 4.17%;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, 4.20%;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, 4.17%;
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, 3.98%;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, 3.99%;
(VIII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2033, 3.93%; AND
(IX) FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, the change in the per pupil
amount from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year divided by the per pupil amount
from the prior fiscal year.
(4) “Target per pupil foundation amount” means the figure calculated for
each fiscal year by the Department in accordance with [§ 5–202] § 5–201 of this article.
8–710.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Change in the per pupil amount” means:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, 4.97%;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, 5.48%;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, 4.17%;
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, 4.20%;
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, 4.17%;
(VI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, 3.98%;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032, 3.99%;
(VIII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2033, 3.93%; AND
– 47 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IX) FOR SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEARS, the change in the per pupil
foundation amount from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year divided by the per
pupil foundation amount from the prior fiscal year.
(4) “Per pupil foundation amount” means the figure calculated for each
fiscal year by the Department in accordance with [§ 5–202] § 5–201 of this article.
9.9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Community school” means a public school that establishes a set of strategic
partnerships between the school and other community resources that leverage shared
accountability, collaborative leadership, capacity building, and authentic family and
community engagement, using a student–centered framework to promote inclusive student
achievement, positive learning conditions, and the well–being of students, families,
educators, and the community through a variety of engaging practices including the
provision of wraparound services.
(c) “School–community partnership” means a partnership between a local school
system or an existing public school and a community–based organization or agency for the
purpose of planning and implementing a community school.
(d) “Trauma–informed intervention” means a method for understanding and
responding to an individual with symptoms of chronic interpersonal trauma or traumatic
stress.
(e) “Wraparound services” [means] INCLUDES:
(1) Extended learning time, including before and after school, weekends,
summer school, and an extended school year;
(2) Safe transportation to and from school and off–site learning
opportunities, including apprenticeship programs;
(3) Vision, hearing, and dental care services;
(4) Establishing or expanding school–based health center services;
(5) Additional social workers, mentors, counselors, therapists,
psychologists, and restorative practice coaches;
(6) Enhancing physical wellness, including providing healthy food for
in–school and out–of–school time and linkages to community providers;
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(7) Enhancing behavioral health services, including access to mental
health practitioners and providing professional development to school staff to provide
trauma–informed interventions;
(8) Providing family and community engagement and supports, including
informing parents of academic course offerings, language classes, workforce development
training, opportunities for children, and available social services as well as educating
families on how to monitor a child’s learning;
(9) Establishing and enhancing linkages to Judy Centers and other early
education programs that feed into the school;
(10) Enhancing student enrichment experiences, including educational field
trips, partnerships, and programs with museums, arts organizations, and cultural
institutions;
(11) OFFERING EVIDENCE–BASED IN–SCHOOL AND IN–PERSON
TUTORING, PROVIDED DURING THE SCHOOL DAY;
(12) Improving student attendance AND CHRONIC ABSENTEEISM;
(12) (13) Improving the learning environment AND NUMBER OF HIGHLY
QUALIFIED TEACHERS at the school; [and]
(13) (14) Any professional development for teachers and school staff to
quickly identify students who are in need of these resources; AND
(14) OTHER SERVICES AS DEFINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
GUIDANCE OR REGULATION.
9.9–102.
The purpose of a community school is to help students and families overcome the
in–school and out–of–school barriers that prevent [children] STUDENTS from learning and
succeeding over the course of their lives by having an integrated focus on academics, health
and social services, youth and community development, and authentic family and
community engagement.
9.9–103.
(a) There are community schools in the State.
(b) A community school shall:
– 49 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Promote active family and community engagement, including
educational opportunities for adults and family members of students at the school who live
in the neighborhood of the school;
(2) Have at least one community school coordinator, as described under §
9.9–104 of this title;
(3) Implement, in a manner responsive to the needs assessment required
under § 9.9–104 of this title, expanded and enriched learning time and opportunities
provided after school, during weekends, and in the summer that emphasize mastering
21st–century skills through practical learning opportunities and community
problem–solving;
(4) Implement collaborative leadership and accountability practices that
empower parents, students, teachers, principals, and community partners to build a culture
of professional learning, collective trust, and shared responsibility using strategies such as
site–based leadership teams and teacher learning communities;
(5) Have a parent teacher organization or a school family council; and
(6) Have a community school leadership team, including members who
represent students, families, and educators.
(c) (1) There shall be a Director of Community Schools WITHIN THE OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SCHOOLS AND EXPANDED LEARNING Time in the Department.
(2) The Director of Community Schools in the Department shall coordinate
professional development for community school coordinators at each community school.
(3) The Director of Community Schools shall support the outreach and
implementation of State programs for children in community schools.
(4) (i) The Director of Community Schools shall create a common needs
assessment tool that each community school coordinator shall use in order to complete the
needs assessment required under § 9.9–104 of this title.
(ii) The Director of Community Schools shall consult with local
school systems and members of the community schools’ leadership teams in order to
determine the correct content to include in the common needs assessment tool.
(5) The Director of Community Schools shall develop an evaluation form to
be used by [community school coordinators] LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS to complete the
evaluation required under § 5–223 of this article.
(6) In addition to the funding provided for the Director of Community
Schools position in the Department, the Governor may include in the annual budget bill an
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
appropriation [of at least $100,000] to the Department for the Director of Community
Schools to provide training and technical assistance to community schools and for
additional staff.
(7) THE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SCHOOLS AND EXPANDED
LEARNING TIME MAY HIRE STAFF TO SUPPORT THE DIRECTOR OF COMMUNITY
SCHOOLS IN PROVIDING DIRECT GUIDANCE AND DIRECTION TO LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY SCHOOL COORDINATORS.
9.9–104.
(a) (1) A community school shall have an experienced and qualified
community school coordinator who:
(i) Is hired at the appropriate administrative level;
(ii) Understands, respects, and demonstrates a high degree of
cultural awareness of and competency in the diversity in the community and in
cross–cultural practice with stakeholders; and
(iii) May be employed by the school district.
(2) A community school coordinator may be a social worker.
(b) (1) A community school coordinator shall be responsible for:
(i) Establishing a community school;
(ii) Completing an assessment of the needs of the students in the
school for appropriate wraparound services to enhance the success of all students in the
school;
(iii) Developing an implementation plan based on the assessment of
needs for the community school, in cooperation with other interested stakeholders; and
(iv) Coordinating support programs that address out–of–school
learning barriers for students and families, including:
1. Wraparound services; and
2. As appropriate:
A. Tutoring;
B. [English language] MULTILINGUAL learner courses;
– 51 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. Early childhood development and parenting classes;
D. College and career advising;
E. Employment opportunities;
F. Citizenship education;
G. Food pantries;
H. Rental assistance, in accordance with § 9.9–104.1 of this
subtitle; and
I. School–based behavioral and physical health services.
(2) The needs assessment completed under this subsection shall:
(i) Be completed in collaboration with:
1. The principal;
2. A school health care practitioner;
3. A parent teacher organization or a school council; and
4. Members of the community schools’ leadership teams;
(ii) Include an assessment of the physical, behavioral, mental, social,
and emotional health needs and wraparound service needs of students, their families, and
their communities;
(iii) Be completed using the common needs assessment tool developed
by the Director of Community Schools under § 9.9–103 of this title, when the tool is
available;
(iv) Be submitted to the Department and the local school system
within 1 year of receiving a personnel grant under § 5–223 of this article or within 1 year
of becoming a community school; and
(v) Be published online.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR SCHOOL
IMPLEMENTATION PLANS AND COUNTYWIDE COMMUNITY SCHOOL
IMPLEMENTATION PLANS AND COUNTYWIDE COMMUNITY SCHOOL
IMPLEMENTATION PLANS.
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
[(3)] (4) The implementation plan completed under this subsection shall
include:
(i) A strategy for providing wraparound services to address the
needs of the students, their families, and their communities, building on and strengthening
community resources near the school;
(II) A SET OF MEASURABLE GOALS TIED TO THE PRIORITIES
IDENTIFIED IN THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT THAT WILL BE MEASURED ANNUALLY AT
LEAST ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS BY THE COMMUNITY SCHOOL COORDINATOR AND
PRINCIPAL TO DETERMINE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING THE GOALS;
[(ii)] (III) Inclusion, if possible and practicable, of community
partners in geographic proximity to the school that can assist in meeting the needs
identified in the assessment;
[(iii)] (IV) Ensure that time is made available to train staff on the
supports available, the need for the supports, and how to engage with the community
schools coordinator to access these supports; and
[(iv)] (V) Develop strategies to maximize external non–State or
non–local education funding.
[(4) (i)] (5) The implementation plan shall be submitted to the local
school system for approval within 1 year of completion of the needs assessment.
[(ii) After the implementation plan is approved by the local school
system it shall be submitted to the Department for review.
(iii) The Department may provide comments to the community school
coordinator on the implementation plan.]
[(5)] (6) (i) A community school coordinator shall review the
implementation plan [at least once every 3 2 years] ANNUALLY to determine whether the
community school is meeting students’ needs AND MAKING PROGRESS TOWARD THE
MEASURABLE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(ii) A community school coordinator shall alter the implementation
plan, using the common needs assessment tool, and the provision of wraparound services
to address changes in students’ needs.
– 53 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) An updated implementation plan shall be submitted to the local
school system for approval.
[(iv) After an updated implementation plan is approved, it shall be
submitted to the Department for review.
(v) The Department may provide comments to the community school
coordinator on the updated implementation plan.]
(7) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A COMMUNITY SCHOOL
HAS NOT EXPENDED FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN APPROVED IMPLEMENTATION
PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER § 5–223(H) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
DIRECT A COUNTY BOARD TO EXPEND A REASONABLE PERCENTAGE OF THE FUNDS
DUE TO THE COMMUNITY SCHOOL UNDER § 5–223(E) OF THIS ARTICLE ON BEHALF
OF THE COMMUNITY SCHOOL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE APPROVED
IMPLEMENTATION PLAN.
(8) (I) A SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT IS AUTHORIZED TO EXPEND FUNDS
ON BEHALF OF A COMMUNITY SCHOOL UNDER § 5–223(G) OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL
DEVELOP COUNTYWIDE COMMUNITY SCHOOL IMPLEMENTATION PLANS THAT
INCORPORATE SCHOOL–LEVEL IMPLEMENTATION PLANS.
(II) THE COUNTYWIDE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN SHALL INCLUDE
A SET OF MEASURABLE GOALS TIED TO THE PRIORITIES IDENTIFIED IN THE NEEDS
ASSESSMENT THAT WILL BE MEASURED AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS BY THE
COMMUNITY SCHOOL COORDINATOR TO DETERMINE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING
THE GOALS.
(7) (I) LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS SHALL DEVELOP COUNTYWIDE
COMMUNITY SCHOOL IMPLEMENTATION PLANS THAT INCORPORATE
SCHOOL–LEVEL IMPLEMENTATION PLANS.
(II) THE COUNTYWIDE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN SHALL INCLUDE
A SET OF MEASURABLE GOALS TIED TO THE PRIORITIES IDENTIFIED IN THE NEEDS
ASSESSMENT THAT WILL BE MEASURED ANNUALLY BY THE COMMUNITY SCHOOL
COORDINATOR TO DETERMINE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING THE GOALS.
(III) IF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM FAILS TO PROVIDE THE
DEPARTMENT WITH A COUNTYWIDE COMMUNITY SCHOOL IMPLEMENTATION PLAN
THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE DEPARTMENT’S GUIDANCE AND
REGULATIONS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY WITHHOLD FUNDS OR TAKE OTHER
COMPLIANCE ACTIONS AS NECESSARY.
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
TITLE 9.12. ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
9.12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COORDINATOR OF PROFESSIONAL LEARNING” MEANS A CERTIFIED
EDUCATOR WHO DEVELOPS AND FACILITATES PROFESSIONAL LEARNING
OPPORTUNITIES FOR EDUCATORS AND ADMINISTRATORS IN THE STATE TO
IMPLEMENT EVIDENCE–BASED INSTRUCTIONAL PRACTICES IN EARLY CHILDHOOD
EDUCATION, LITERACY, MATHEMATICS, SCIENCE, SOCIAL STUDIES, AND SPECIAL
EDUCATION.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
(D) “INSTRUCTIONAL COACH” MEANS A CERTIFIED EDUCATOR WHO
PROVIDES COACHING TO EDUCATORS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND OTHER EDUCATION
PROFESSIONALS TO IMPROVE INSTRUCTION AND INTEGRATE EVIDENCE–BASED
PRACTICES.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
9.12–102.
(A) THERE IS AN ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ADDRESS CRITICAL ACADEMIC
NEEDS IN SCHOOLS TO ENSURE MARYLAND STUDENTS HAVE EQUITABLE ACCESS TO
HIGH–QUALITY INSTRUCTION AND TARGETED ACADEMIC SUPPORT.
(C) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL ESTABLISH SYSTEMS THAT ENSURE
EDUCATORS HAVE CONSISTENT ACCESS TO HIGH–QUALITY, JOB–EMBEDDED, AND
SUSTAINED PROFESSIONAL LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL USE COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL
LEARNING AND INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES TO ENHANCE INSTRUCTIONAL
PRACTICES AND COLLABORATE WITH SCHOOLS AND COUNTY BOARDS TO
STRENGTHEN SYSTEMS OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) PROMOTE THE PROGRAM TO COUNTY BOARDS;
– 55 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR HIRING QUALIFIED EDUCATORS AND
ADMINISTRATORS INTERESTED IN BECOMING COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL
LEARNING OR INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES;
(3) IDENTIFY SCHOOLS FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM BASED
ON THE SCHOOL’S ACCOUNTABILITY DATA; AND
(4) DEVELOP TRAINING FOR ALL COORDINATORS OF PROFESSIONAL
LEARNING AND INSTRUCTIONAL COACHES.
9.12–103.
(A) (1) THERE IS AN ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ADDRESS
CRITICAL ACADEMIC NEEDS IN SCHOOLS, PARTICULARLY THOSE IDENTIFIED AS
LOW–PERFORMING.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND; AND
(II) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR GRANTS TO COUNTY BOARDS,
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, OR OTHER
ENTITIES FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
(I) CONTRACTS WITH VENDORS TO PROVIDE SERVICES;
(II) TRAINING AND WORKSHOPS;
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(III) PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION;
(IV) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE PROGRAM;
(V) PROGRAM EVALUATION AND REPORTING; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER COSTS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND UNDER § 5–206 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(8) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FOLLOWING DATA:
(1) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY DISBURSED FROM THE FUND,
DISAGGREGATED BY COUNTY; AND
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SCHOOLS SERVED BY THE FUND.
9.12–104.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS TITLE.
18–27A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Collaborative” means an agreement outlining commitments of a partnership
among:
(1) At least one local school system;
(2) At least one employee organization representing employees of a local
school system in accordance with Title 6, Subtitle 4 or Subtitle 5 of this article; and
– 57 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (I) At least one institution of higher education [with a teacher
preparation program approved by the Department] IN THE STATE; OR
(II) AN ALTERNATIVE PARTNERSHIP MODEL FORMED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 18–27A–04(E) OR (F) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) [“Noncertified education support professional” means a noncertified public
school employee designated as part of a bargaining unit under Title 6, Subtitle 5 of this
article PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WHO IS NOT:
(1) A CERTIFICATED EMPLOYEE DESIGNATED AS PART OF A
BARGAINING UNIT UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) A MANAGERIAL EMPLOYEE; OR
(3) A CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEE.
(d)] “Program” means the Grow Your Own Educators Grant Program established
under this subtitle.
(D) “TEACHER CANDIDATE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM.
[(e) “Provisional teacher” means an individual employed by a local school system
through a provisional contract as a conditional teacher.]
18–27A–02.
(a) There is a Grow Your Own Educators Grant Program.
(b) (1) The purpose of the Program is to provide support to COLLABORATIVES
THAT PRIORITIZE OFFER TEACHER LICENSURE PROGRAMS THAT EMPHASIZE WITH
ON–THE–JOB EXPERIENTIAL LEARNING FOR eligible individuals who:
(i) Are interested in pursuing a career in the teaching profession;
[and]
(ii) ARE HIRED EMPLOYED BY A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN THE
STATE AS A SCHOOL–BASED PART–TIME OR FULL–TIME EMPLOYEE; AND
(III) Ultimately pledge to fulfill a 3–YEAR service obligation as a
teacher employed full–time in a high–needs school, grade level, or content area in the [State
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
in which there is a shortage of teachers, as identified by the Department] LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM IN WHICH THEY ARE CURRENTLY EMPLOYED.
(2) The Department shall administer the Program.
(c) [(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, to] TO be eligible for the
Program, a teacher candidate applicant shall:
(1) MEET ONE OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
(i) Be employed [as a noncertified education support professional or
provisional teacher] by a participating local school system [on the effective date of the
Program] IN A SCHOOL–BASED POSITION; [and] OR
(ii) (2) [Meet the educational requirements determined by a
collaborative] HAVE A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA OR ITS EQUIVALENT; AND
(2) (3) PURSUE COMMITS TO PURSUE A TEACHER LICENSURE
PATHWAY APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
[(2) Not more than one quarter of the funds used to support teaching
candidate applicants may be used to support teaching candidate applicants who are
provisional teachers.]
18–27A–03.
(a) A collaborative shall negotiate an agreement that meets the requirements of
subsection (b) of this section.
(b) A collaborative shall develop and submit to the Department:
(1) A plan [to] THAT INCLUDES:
(i) [Select] IDENTIFICATION OF THE COLLABORATIVE
MEMBERS, INCLUDING THE ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF EACH MEMBER;
(II) SCHOOL–BASED PART–TIME OR FULL–TIME POSITIONS
THAT ALLOW THE A TEACHER CANDIDATE TO SYSTEMATICALLY DEVELOP THE
SKILLS OF A TEACH–THROUGH–EXPERIENTIAL–LEARNING AND DEMONSTRATION
OF DEVELOP TEACHING SKILLS THROUGH EXPERIENTIAL LEARNING AND
ULTIMATELY DEMONSTRATE TEACHING COMPETENCIES;
(III) IDENTIFICATION OF at least one content area in the local school
system in which there is a shortage of teachers, as identified by the Department;
– 59 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii) Select at least one teacher preparation program at an institution
of higher education that satisfies the training requirements for teacher candidates; and
(iii) Designate an individual from a collaborative to assist teacher
candidates and provide Program guidance;]
(IV) A MINIMUM RATIO OF ONE MENTOR WHO IS A REGULARLY
EMPLOYED PER ONE TEACHER IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM ASSIGNED FOR THE
ENTIRETY OF THE PROGRAM TO A TEACHER CANDIDATE, CONSISTENT WITH
PROPER SUPERVISION, TRAINING, AND CONTINUITY OF EMPLOYMENT AND
APPLICABLE PROVISIONS IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS;
(V) A SYSTEMIC PROGRAM OF EXPERIENTIAL LEARNING THAT
RESULTS IN CREDITS FROM THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IF CREDITS
ARE REQUIRED FOR COMPLETION, INCLUDING CREDITS TOWARD THE PRACTICUM;
AND
(VI) THE DESIGNATION OF A PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR FROM
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM TO ASSIST TEACHER CANDIDATES, EVALUATE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROGRAM, AND MANAGE THE ADMINISTRATION
ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROGRAM;
(2) An estimate, BASED ON APPROPRIATE DATA, of the [numbers of:
(i) Teacher applicants likely to complete the Program who are
noncertificated education support professionals;
(ii) Teacher applicants likely to complete the Program who are
provisional teachers; and
(iii) Mentor teachers necessary to support teacher candidates in the
Program] NUMBER OF PROJECTED PARTICIPANTS TO INCLUDE IN THE PROGRAM;
and
(3) Evidence of a written billing agreement with an institution of higher
education that includes:
(i) The total cost to the collaborative for the cohort of teacher
candidates;
(ii) Prorated tuition cost the collaborative shall pay the institution of
higher education if a candidate does not complete the Program; and
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(iii) A provision that no teacher candidate shall be required to pay
tuition, books, or fees as part of the teacher candidate’s course of study.
(c) A collaborative shall develop and submit to the Department:
(1) An outreach plan to recruit teacher candidates and mentor teachers
that:
(i) Prioritizes candidates and mentor teachers with linguistic
diversity and from racial and ethnic groups historically underrepresented in the teaching
profession; AND
(ii) [Estimates Program expenses by category, keeping program
expenses related to provisional teachers at or below one quarter of total expenses; and
(iii) Identifies at least one source of long–term funding for the
Program, including the process and timeline for obtaining long–term funding] INCLUDES
RECRUITMENT INITIATIVES THAT TARGET HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATES, ASSOCIATE
OF ARTS AND TEACHING DEGREE CANDIDATES, CAREER CHANGERS, AND
COMMUNITY MEMBERS INTERESTED IN THE TEACHING PROFESSION; AND
(III) IDENTIFIES A SUSTAINABILITY PLAN TO CONTINUE
RECRUITING, PREPARING, AND MENTORING TEACHER CANDIDATES AFTER
COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM; and
(2) Any other materials required by the Department.
18–27A–04.
(A) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT
WITH A NATIONAL NONPROFIT ENTITY THAT HAS SUCCESSFULLY GUIDED OTHER
STATE EDUCATION AGENCIES OR LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCIES THAT HAVE
INCREASED THE NUMBER OF LICENSED TEACHERS BY:
(I) LAUNCHING SUSTAINABLE, COST–EFFECTIVE
GROW–YOUR–OWN TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS;
(II) IMPLEMENTING REGISTERED TEACHER APPRENTICESHIPS;
AND
(III) IMPLEMENTING TEACHER RESIDENCIES.
(2) THE ENTITY SELECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SUPPORT THE DEPARTMENT IN THE DESIGN,
– 61 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
IMPLEMENTATION, AND EVALUATION OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE
DEVELOPMENT OF METRICS FOR ESTABLISHING HIGH–QUALITY TEACHER
PREPARATION AND LICENSURE PROGRAMS THAT HAVE THE HIGHEST LIKELIHOOD
OF INCREASING AIDING THE STATE BY:
(I) INCREASING THE TEACHER WORKFORCE IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) IMPROVING TEACHER RETENTION AND DIVERSITY.
(3) THE ENTITY SELECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY WORK DIRECTLY WITH COLLABORATIVES TO SUPPORT THE
DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF GROW–YOUR–OWN TEACHER
PREPARATION PROGRAMS.
[(a) (1)] (B) [The] BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, THE Department shall
award a grant to a local school system OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION that is
part of a collaborative for employees of the local school system to complete a [teacher
preparation program at an institution of higher education] PATHWAY TO TEACHER
LICENSURE under the agreement described in § 18–27A–03 of this subtitle.
[(2)] (C) The Department shall award a grant TO A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM for:
[(i)] (1) Tuition, books, and fees for teacher candidates;
[(ii)] (2) Stipends for mentor teachers; and
[(iii)] (3) Costs associated with the administration of the Program.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD A GRANT TO AN INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION FOR:
(1) CURRICULAR DEVELOPMENT;
(2) DEVELOPMENT OF COMPETENCY–BASED COURSEWORK AND
ASSESSMENTS; AND
(3) COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DELIVERY AND EVALUATION OF
ON–THE–JOB EXPERIENTIAL LEARNING.
(E) (1) GRANTS SHALL BE AWARDED ON A COMPETITIVE BASIS.
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
[(3)] (F) (2) In awarding a grant, the Department shall [take necessary steps
to ensure that not more than one quarter of expenses awarded in the grant go to supporting
provisional teacher participants in the Program] PRIORITIZE COLLABORATIVES THAT
PARTNER WITH INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION OFFERING TO NEGOTIATE A
LOWER TUITION COST FOR TEACHER CANDIDATES.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD A GRANT TO A COLLABORATIVE FORMED
BETWEEN AT LEAST ONE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM AND ONE EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES OF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 4 OR SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS ARTICLE, IF THE
COLLABORATIVE USES A PROGRAM MODEL THAT ALLOWS CANDIDATES TO COMPLETE
COURSEWORK THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE ENROLLMENT IN AN INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO COLLABORATIVES THAT
IMPLEMENT A REGISTERED TEACHER APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM MODEL UNDER
THE PROGRAM.
(2) IN AWARDING A GRANT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE COLLABORATIVES THAT:
(I) ARE COMPOSED OF A GROUP OF MORE THAN ONE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM AND MORE THAN ONE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING
EMPLOYEES OF A LOCAL SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 4 OR
SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) IMPLEMENT A REGISTERED TEACHER APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM TO BE ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITH A STANDARDIZED
CURRICULUM THAT PROMOTES ON–THE–JOB EXPERIENTIAL LEARNING TO BE
LEVERAGED ACROSS THE STATE.
(3) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE MAY
PROVIDE RELATED INSTRUCTION FOR A REGISTERED TEACHER APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THROUGH A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS.
[(4) The Department, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of
Labor, shall, on request, provide technical assistance to a collaborative in obtaining State,
federal, or other funding for the operation of the Program.
(b) (E) (G) (1) A teacher candidate shall be paid a rate of pay and offered
benefits that are at least equal to the rate of pay received by and benefits offered to a
noncertified education support professional or provisional teacher of the equivalent
– 63 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
classification and tenure in the local school system provided in the collective bargaining
agreement.
(c) (1) A collaborative shall provide each teacher candidate a mentor teacher
for the entirety of the Program.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A PROVISIONAL
TEACHER.
(II) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A teacher candidate may not serve as a teacher of record or a substitute
teacher for any teacher other than the mentor teacher assigned to the teacher candidate.]
(III) A TEACHER CANDIDATE MAY SERVE AS A DAILY SUBSTITUTE
TEACHER IF:
1. THE TEACHER CANDIDATE DOES SO IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
2. THE TEACHER CANDIDATE AGREES TO THE
ASSIGNMENT;
3. THE TEACHER CANDIDATE’S MENTOR APPROVES OF
THE ASSIGNMENT; AND
4. THE PRINCIPAL OF THE SCHOOL IN WHICH THE
TEACHER CANDIDATE IS EMPLOYED APPROVES OF THE ASSIGNMENT.
(G) (F) (H) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY NOT REDUCE THE COMPENSATION
OR BENEFITS OF A TEACHER CANDIDATE.
[(d)] (H) (G) (I) A local school system and an employee organization that
represents the teacher candidates shall negotiate a gradual release model that allows
teacher candidates to focus primarily on internship and practicum requirements, IF
APPLICABLE.
[(e)] (I) (H) (J) A teacher candidate shall perform a service obligation to teach
full–time in the State in a public school or a public prekindergarten program in a
[high–needs school, as identified by the Department, or in a grade level or] content area in
which there is a shortage of qualified educators, as identified by the Department for a
minimum of 2 years.
18–27A–05.
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
The Governor may include in the annual budget bill an appropriation for the
Program.
18–27A–06.
(a) Each year, the Department shall collect [and publish on its website]:
(1) Data on teacher candidate race, gender, and linguistic status;
(2) Data on teacher candidate status and retention;
(3) Spending by category;
(4) A summary of teacher candidate recruitment methods; and
(5) If applicable, the hiring status and retention data of Program
graduates.
(b) (1) [In reporting] WHEN COLLECTING ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026,
AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ON the data
COLLECTED under subsection (a) of this section TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) IN ISSUING REPORTS UNDER THIS SECTION, the Department shall
make reasonable efforts to anonymize the data to protect the privacy of teacher candidates.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
6–126.
(a) (1) This subsection applies to individuals who have graduated from a
teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher preparation program.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2025, to qualify for an initial certificate an
individual shall:
(i) Pass the subject–specific examinations under § 6–125 of this
subtitle;
(ii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
– 65 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, pass a
nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of teaching ability; or
2. Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, complete a
rigorous local school system teacher induction program that lasts for the lesser of:
A. 3 years; or
B. The amount of time a teacher may hold a conditional
teacher certificate;
(iii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Pass a basic literacy skills assessment approved by the
Department under § 6–125 of this subtitle;
2. Hold a degree from a regionally accredited educational
institution and have earned a minimum overall cumulative grade point average of 3.0 on a
4.0 scale or its equivalent on the most recently earned degree; or
3. Submit documentation to the Department of having
received effective evaluations from a local school system for 3 years;
(iv) Pass a rigorous State–specific examination of mastery of reading
instruction and content for the grade level the individual will be teaching; and
(v) Satisfactorily complete any other requirements established by
the State Board.
(3) An individual who graduates from a teacher preparation program in
the State who passed a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment may not be
required to take the assessment more than one time.
(4) (i) In order to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2)(ii)2 of this
subsection, a candidate for an initial teacher certificate shall submit documentation to the
Department that the candidate has completed a rigorous comprehensive induction
program, established in accordance with § 6–117 of this subtitle, that meets the
requirements of this paragraph.
(ii) The comprehensive induction program shall be developed by a
local school system, either independently or collaboratively with other local school systems.
(iii) Before establishing a comprehensive induction program, one or
more local school systems shall submit a plan for the program to the Department and the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(iv) The comprehensive induction program shall include a locally
developed portfolio component that is aligned with the Interstate Teacher Assessment and
Support Consortium Standards.
(v) A teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher
preparation program may use the locally developed portfolio component under
subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph as meeting a portion of the coursework requirements
of the program.
(vi) A candidate who satisfactorily completes a comprehensive
induction program established in accordance with this paragraph may not be required to
pass a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of teaching ability.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TEACHER WHO HOLDS A
PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE FROM A STATE FOR WHICH THE LICENSE
OR CERTIFICATE IS ACCEPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT UNDER SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) In addition to any other requirements established by the State Board,
to qualify for a certificate in the State, a teacher who graduated from an institution of
higher education in another state or holds a professional license or certificate from another
state shall:
[(1)] (I) Pass an examination of teaching ability within 18 months of
being hired by a local school system;
[(2)] (II) Hold an active National Board Certification from the National
Board for Professional Teaching Standards; or
[(3)] (III) Complete a comprehensive induction program in accordance with
subsection (a)(4) of this section.
(c) (1) The Department, after a reasonable period of review and assessment,
shall determine whether one of the assessments of teaching skill approved for initial
teacher certification under this section more adequately measures the skills and knowledge
required of a highly qualified teacher.
(2) If the Department makes a determination under paragraph (1) of this
subsection that requires a revision to the statutory requirements for initial teacher
certification, the Department shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, submit a report to the General Assembly on or before the next September 1 on its
recommendations for revising the qualifications for initial teacher certification.
(d) (1) The Department shall actively monitor and assess, during their
implementation and development, new teacher standards and assessments produced under
– 67 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
this section for any negative impact on the diversity of teacher candidates passing the
initial teacher certification assessments.
(2) The Department shall report the results of its monitoring and
assessment to the Accountability and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of
this article.
SUBTITLE 6. INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT.
6–601.
THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT IS HEREBY ENACTED AND
ENTERED INTO WITH ALL OTHER JURISDICTIONS THAT LEGALLY JOIN IN THIS
COMPACT IN THE FORM SUBSTANTIALLY AS THE COMPACT APPEARS IN THIS
SECTION AS FOLLOWS:
ARTICLE I. PURPOSE.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS COMPACT IS TO FACILITATE THE MOBILITY OF
TEACHERS ACROSS THE MEMBER STATES, WITH THE GOAL OF SUPPORTING
TEACHERS THROUGH A NEW PATHWAY TO LICENSURE. THROUGH THIS COMPACT,
THE MEMBER STATES SEEK TO ESTABLISH A COLLECTIVE REGULATORY
FRAMEWORK THAT EXPEDITES AND ENHANCES THE ABILITY OF TEACHERS TO MOVE
ACROSS STATE LINES.
THIS COMPACT IS INTENDED TO ACHIEVE THE FOLLOWING OBJECTIVES AND
SHOULD BE INTERPRETED ACCORDINGLY. THE MEMBER STATES HEREBY RATIFY
THE SAME INTENTIONS BY SUBSCRIBING HERETO.
A. CREATE A STREAMLINED PATHWAY TO LICENSURE MOBILITY FOR
TEACHERS;
B. SUPPORT THE RELOCATION OF ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSES;
C. FACILITATE AND ENHANCE THE EXCHANGE OF LICENSURE,
INVESTIGATIVE, AND DISCIPLINARY INFORMATION BETWEEN THE MEMBER
STATES;
D. ENHANCE THE POWER OF STATE AND DISTRICT LEVEL EDUCATION
OFFICIALS TO HIRE QUALIFIED, COMPETENT TEACHERS BY REMOVING BARRIERS
TO THE EMPLOYMENT OF OUT–OF–STATE TEACHERS;
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
E. SUPPORT THE RETENTION OF TEACHERS IN THE PROFESSION BY
REMOVING BARRIERS TO RE–LICENSURE IN A NEW STATE; AND
F. MAINTAIN STATE SOVEREIGNTY IN THE REGULATION OF THE TEACHING
PROFESSION.
ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS.
AS USED IN THIS COMPACT, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED, THE
FOLLOWING DEFINITIONS SHALL GOVERN THE TERMS HEREIN:
A. “ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER” MEANS ANY PERSON WITH FULL–TIME
DUTY STATUS IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING
MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE.
B. “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS ANY LIMITATION OR RESTRICTION IMPOSED
BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY, SUCH AS REVOCATION,
SUSPENSION, REPRIMAND, PROBATION, OR LIMITATION ON THE LICENSEE’S
ABILITY TO WORK AS A TEACHER.
C. “BYLAWS” MEANS THOSE BYLAWS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION.
D. “CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSE” MEANS A CURRENT,
VALID AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY
ALLOWING AN INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE AS A TEACHER IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL
SETTINGS IN A SPECIFIC CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION AREA.
E. “CHARTER MEMBER STATE” MEANS A MEMBER STATE THAT HAS
ENACTED LEGISLATION TO ADOPT THIS COMPACT WHERE SUCH LEGISLATION
PREDATES THE INITIAL MEETING OF THE COMMISSION AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THE COMPACT.
F. “COMMISSION” MEANS THE INTERSTATE ADMINISTRATIVE BODY
WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF DELEGATES OF ALL STATES THAT HAVE
ENACTED THIS COMPACT, AND WHICH IS KNOWN AS THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT COMMISSION.
G. “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE DELEGATE OF A MEMBER STATE.
H. “ELIGIBLE LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE TO ENGAGE IN THE TEACHING
PROFESSION THAT REQUIRES AT LEAST A BACHELOR’S DEGREE AND THE
COMPLETION OF A STATE APPROVED PROGRAM FOR TEACHER LICENSURE.
– 69 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
I. “ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF ANY INDIVIDUAL
IN FULL–TIME DUTY STATUS IN THE ACTIVE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES
INCLUDING MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE MOVING AS A
RESULT OF A MILITARY MISSION OR MILITARY CAREER PROGRESSION
REQUIREMENTS OR ON MEMBER’S TERMINAL MOVE AS A RESULT OF SEPARATION
OR RETIREMENT (TO INCLUDE SURVIVING SPOUSES OF DECEASED MILITARY
MEMBERS).
J. “EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE” MEANS A GROUP OF COMMISSIONERS
ELECTED OR APPOINTED TO ACT ON BEHALF OF, AND WITHIN THE POWERS
GRANTED TO THEM BY, THE COMMISSION AS PROVIDED FOR HEREIN.
K. “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS AN OFFICIAL, AGENCY, BOARD, OR
OTHER ENTITY OF A STATE THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LICENSING AND
REGULATION OF TEACHERS AUTHORIZED TO TEACH IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL
SETTINGS.
L. “MEMBER STATE” MEANS ANY STATE THAT HAS ADOPTED THIS
COMPACT, INCLUDING ALL AGENCIES AND OFFICIALS OF SUCH A STATE.
M. “RECEIVING STATE” MEANS ANY STATE WHERE A TEACHER HAS
APPLIED FOR LICENSURE UNDER THIS COMPACT.
N. “RULE” MEANS ANY REGULATION PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER THIS COMPACT, WHICH SHALL HAVE THE FORCE OF LAW IN EACH MEMBER
STATE.
O. “STATE” MEANS A STATE, TERRITORY, OR POSSESSION OF THE UNITED
STATES, AND THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
P. “STATE PRACTICE LAWS” MEANS A MEMBER STATE’S LAWS, RULES,
AND REGULATIONS THAT GOVERN THE TEACHING PROFESSION, DEFINE THE SCOPE
OF SUCH PROFESSION, AND CREATE THE METHODS AND GROUNDS FOR IMPOSING
DISCIPLINE.
Q. “STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENT” MEANS A REQUIREMENT FOR
LICENSURE COVERED IN COURSEWORK OR EXAMINATION THAT INCLUDES CONTENT
OF UNIQUE INTEREST TO THE STATE.
R. “TEACHER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CURRENTLY HOLDS AN
AUTHORIZATION FROM A MEMBER STATE THAT FORMS THE BASIS FOR
EMPLOYMENT IN THE P–12 PUBLIC SCHOOLS OF THE STATE TO PROVIDE
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
INSTRUCTION IN A SPECIFIC SUBJECT AREA, GRADE LEVEL, OR STUDENT
POPULATION.
S. “UNENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A CURRENT, VALID
AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY ALLOWING
AN INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE AS A TEACHER IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL SETTINGS.
AN UNENCUMBERED LICENSE IS NOT A RESTRICTED, PROBATIONARY,
PROVISIONAL, SUBSTITUTE, OR TEMPORARY CREDENTIAL.
ARTICLE III. LICENSURE UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. LICENSURE UNDER THIS COMPACT PERTAINS ONLY TO THE INITIAL
GRANT OF A LICENSE BY THE RECEIVING STATE. NOTHING HEREIN APPLIES TO ANY
SUBSEQUENT OR ONGOING COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENTS THAT A RECEIVING STATE
MIGHT REQUIRE FOR TEACHERS.
B. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF
THE COMMISSION, DEFINE, COMPILE, AND UPDATE AS NECESSARY A LIST OF
ELIGIBLE LICENSES AND CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSES THAT
THE MEMBER STATE IS WILLING TO CONSIDER FOR EQUIVALENCY UNDER THIS
COMPACT AND PROVIDE THE LIST TO THE COMMISSION. THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE
THOSE LICENSES THAT A RECEIVING STATE IS WILLING TO GRANT TO TEACHERS
FROM OTHER MEMBER STATES, PENDING A DETERMINATION OF EQUIVALENCY BY
THE RECEIVING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY.
C. UPON THE RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE BY A
TEACHER HOLDING AN UNENCUMBERED ELIGIBLE LICENSE, THE RECEIVING
STATE SHALL DETERMINE WHICH OF THE RECEIVING STATE’S ELIGIBLE LICENSES
THE TEACHER IS QUALIFIED TO HOLD AND SHALL GRANT SUCH A LICENSE OR
LICENSES TO THE APPLICANT. SUCH A DETERMINATION SHALL BE MADE IN THE
SOLE DISCRETION OF THE RECEIVING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY AND MAY
INCLUDE A DETERMINATION THAT THE APPLICANT IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR ANY OF
THE RECEIVING STATE’S ELIGIBLE LICENSES. FOR ALL TEACHERS WHO HOLD AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL GRANT ONE OR MORE
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE(S) THAT, IN THE RECEIVING STATE’S SOLE DISCRETION,
ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE LICENSE(S) HELD BY THE TEACHER IN ANY OTHER
MEMBER STATE.
D. FOR ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSES
WHO HOLD A LICENSE THAT IS NOT UNENCUMBERED, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL
GRANT AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE OR LICENSES THAT, IN THE RECEIVING STATE’S
SOLE DISCRETION, IS EQUIVALENT TO THE LICENSE OR LICENSES HELD BY THE
– 71 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
TEACHER IN ANY OTHER MEMBER STATE, EXCEPT WHERE THE RECEIVING STATE
DOES NOT HAVE AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE.
E. FOR A TEACHER HOLDING AN UNENCUMBERED CAREER AND
TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSE, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL GRANT AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE EQUIVALENT TO THE CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION LICENSE HELD BY THE APPLYING TEACHER AND ISSUED BY ANOTHER
MEMBER STATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE RECEIVING STATE IN ITS SOLE
DISCRETION, EXCEPT WHERE A CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION TEACHER
DOES NOT HOLD A BACHELOR’S DEGREE AND THE RECEIVING STATE REQUIRES A
BACHELOR’S DEGREE FOR LICENSES TO TEACH CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION. A RECEIVING STATE MAY REQUIRE CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION TEACHERS TO MEET STATE INDUSTRY RECOGNIZED REQUIREMENTS,
IF REQUIRED BY LAW IN THE RECEIVING STATE.
ARTICLE IV. LICENSURE NOT UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ARTICLE III ABOVE, NOTHING IN THIS
COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR INHIBIT THE POWER OF A MEMBER
STATE TO REGULATE LICENSURE OR ENDORSEMENTS OVERSEEN BY THE MEMBER
STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY.
B. WHEN A TEACHER IS REQUIRED TO RENEW A LICENSE RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT, THE STATE GRANTING SUCH A LICENSE MAY
REQUIRE THE TEACHER TO COMPLETE STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS AS A
CONDITION OF LICENSURE RENEWAL OR ADVANCEMENT IN THAT STATE.
C. FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING COMPENSATION, A RECEIVING
STATE MAY REQUIRE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM TEACHERS RECEIVING A
LICENSE UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
D. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
POWER OF A MEMBER STATE TO CONTROL AND MAINTAIN OWNERSHIP OF ITS
INFORMATION PERTAINING TO TEACHERS, OR LIMIT THE APPLICATION OF A
MEMBER STATE’S LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE OWNERSHIP, USE, OR
DISSEMINATION OF INFORMATION PERTAINING TO TEACHERS.
E. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO INVALIDATE OR
ALTER ANY EXISTING AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE ARRANGEMENT THAT A
MEMBER STATE MAY ALREADY BE A PARTY TO, OR LIMIT THE ABILITY OF A MEMBER
STATE TO PARTICIPATE IN ANY FUTURE AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT TO:
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
1. AWARD TEACHING LICENSES OR OTHER BENEFITS BASED ON
ADDITIONAL PROFESSIONAL CREDENTIALS INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO,
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION;
2. PARTICIPATE IN THE EXCHANGE OF NAMES OF TEACHERS WHOSE
LICENSE HAS BEEN SUBJECT TO AN ADVERSE ACTION BY A MEMBER STATE; OR
3. PARTICIPATE IN ANY AGREEMENT OR COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT WITH A NON–MEMBER STATE.
ARTICLE V. TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE
UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED FOR ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR ELIGIBLE
MILITARY SPOUSES IN ARTICLE III.D ABOVE, A TEACHER MAY ONLY BE ELIGIBLE
TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS COMPACT WHERE THAT TEACHER HOLDS AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE IN A MEMBER STATE.
B. A TEACHER ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS COMPACT
SHALL, UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED FOR HEREIN:
1. UPON THE TEACHER’S APPLICATION TO RECEIVE A LICENSE
UNDER THIS COMPACT, UNDERGO A CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK IN
THE RECEIVING STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF THE
RECEIVING STATE; AND
2. PROVIDE THE RECEIVING STATE WITH INFORMATION IN
ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED FOR LICENSURE FOR THE PURPOSES OF
DETERMINING COMPENSATION, IF APPLICABLE.
ARTICLE VI. DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS.
A. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A MEMBER STATE TO INVESTIGATE OR IMPOSE
DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ON TEACHERS ACCORDING TO THE STATE PRACTICE
LAWS THEREOF.
B. MEMBER STATES SHALL BE AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE, AND SHALL
PROVIDE, FILES AND INFORMATION REGARDING THE INVESTIGATION AND
DISCIPLINE, IF ANY, OF TEACHERS IN OTHER MEMBER STATES UPON REQUEST. ANY
MEMBER STATE RECEIVING SUCH INFORMATION OR FILES SHALL PROTECT AND
MAINTAIN THE SECURITY AND CONFIDENTIALITY THEREOF, IN AT LEAST THE SAME
– 73 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MANNER THAT IT MAINTAINS ITS OWN INVESTIGATORY OR DISCIPLINARY FILES AND
INFORMATION. PRIOR TO DISCLOSING ANY DISCIPLINARY OR INVESTIGATORY
INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM ANOTHER MEMBER STATE, THE DISCLOSING STATE
SHALL COMMUNICATE ITS INTENTION AND PURPOSE FOR SUCH DISCLOSURE TO THE
MEMBER STATE THAT ORIGINALLY PROVIDED THAT INFORMATION.
ARTICLE VII. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY
COMPACT COMMISSION.
A. THE INTERSTATE COMPACT MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE AND
ESTABLISH A JOINT PUBLIC AGENCY KNOWN AS THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT COMMISSION:
1. THE COMMISSION IS A JOINT INTERSTATE GOVERNMENTAL
AGENCY COMPRISED OF STATES THAT HAVE ENACTED THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT.
2. NOTHING IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED
TO BE A WAIVER OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY.
B. MEMBERSHIP, VOTING, AND MEETINGS.
1. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL HAVE AND BE LIMITED TO ONE (1)
DELEGATE TO THE COMMISSION, WHO SHALL BE GIVEN THE TITLE OF
COMMISSIONER.
2. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE THE PRIMARY ADMINISTRATIVE
OFFICER OF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR THEIR DESIGNEE.
3. ANY COMMISSIONER MAY BE REMOVED OR SUSPENDED FROM
OFFICE AS PROVIDED BY THE LAW OF THE STATE FROM WHICH THE COMMISSIONER
IS APPOINTED.
4. THE MEMBER STATE SHALL FILL ANY VACANCY OCCURRING IN
THE COMMISSION WITHIN 90 DAYS.
5. EACH COMMISSIONER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ONE (1) VOTE
ABOUT THE PROMULGATION OF RULES AND CREATION OF BYLAWS AND SHALL
OTHERWISE HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE BUSINESS AND
AFFAIRS OF THE COMMISSION. A COMMISSIONER SHALL VOTE IN PERSON OR BY
SUCH OTHER MEANS AS PROVIDED IN THE BYLAWS. THE BYLAWS MAY PROVIDE FOR
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
COMMISSIONERS’ PARTICIPATION IN MEETINGS BY TELEPHONE OR OTHER MEANS
OF COMMUNICATION.
6. THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. ADDITIONAL MEETINGS SHALL BE HELD AS SET FORTH IN THE
BYLAWS.
7. THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH BY RULE A TERM OF OFFICE
FOR COMMISSIONERS.
C. THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND DUTIES.
1. ESTABLISH A CODE OF ETHICS FOR THE COMMISSION.
2. ESTABLISH THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMISSION.
3. ESTABLISH BYLAWS FOR THE COMMISSION.
4. MAINTAIN ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BYLAWS OF THE COMMISSION.
5. MEET AND TAKE SUCH ACTIONS AS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, THE BYLAWS, AND RULES OF THE
COMMISSION.
6. PROMULGATE UNIFORM RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER
THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT. THE RULES SHALL HAVE THE FORCE AND EFFECT OF
LAW AND SHALL BE BINDING IN ALL MEMBER STATES. IN THE EVENT THE
COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS
BEYOND THE SCOPE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS
GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW.
7. BRING AND PROSECUTE LEGAL PROCEEDINGS OR ACTIONS IN
THE NAME OF THE COMMISSION, PROVIDED THAT THE STANDING OF ANY MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY TO SUE OR BE SUED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW MAY
NOT BE AFFECTED.
8. PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS.
9. BORROW, ACCEPT, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, EMPLOYEES OF A MEMBER STATE, OR AN
– 75 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ASSOCIATED NONGOVERNMENTAL ORGANIZATION THAT IS OPEN TO MEMBERSHIP
BY ALL STATES.
10. HIRE EMPLOYEES, ELECT OR APPOINT OFFICERS, FIX
COMPENSATION, DEFINE DUTIES, GRANT SUCH INDIVIDUALS APPROPRIATE
AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, AND ESTABLISH THE
COMMISSION’S PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST, QUALIFICATIONS OF PERSONNEL, AND OTHER RELATED PERSONNEL
MATTERS.
11. LEASE, PURCHASE, ACCEPT APPROPRIATE GIFTS OR DONATIONS
OF, OR OTHERWISE OWN, HOLD, IMPROVE, OR USE, ANY PROPERTY, REAL,
PERSONAL OR MIXED, PROVIDED THAT AT ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL
AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY.
12. SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE,
ABANDON, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED.
13. ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES.
14. BORROW MONEY.
15. APPOINT COMMITTEES, INCLUDING STANDING COMMITTEES
COMPOSED OF MEMBERS AND SUCH OTHER INTERESTED PERSONS AS MAY BE
DESIGNATED IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, RULES, OR BYLAWS.
16. PROVIDE AND RECEIVE INFORMATION FROM, AND COOPERATE
WITH, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES.
17. ESTABLISH AND ELECT AN EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE.
18. ESTABLISH AND DEVELOP A CHARTER FOR AN EXECUTIVE
INFORMATION GOVERNANCE COMMITTEE TO ADVISE ON FACILITATING EXCHANGE
OF INFORMATION, USE OF INFORMATION, DATA PRIVACY, AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT
NEEDS, AND PROVIDE REPORTS AS NEEDED.
19. PERFORM SUCH OTHER FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT
CONSISTENT WITH THE STATE REGULATION OF TEACHER LICENSURE.
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
20. DETERMINE WHETHER A STATE’S ADOPTED LANGUAGE IS
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT LANGUAGE SUCH THAT THE
STATE WOULD NOT QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
D. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY
COMPACT COMMISSION.
1. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THIS INTERSTATE
COMPACT.
2. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL BE COMPOSED OF EIGHT
VOTING MEMBERS:
A. THE COMMISSION CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, AND TREASURER;
AND
B. FIVE MEMBERS WHO ARE ELECTED BY THE COMMISSION
FROM THE CURRENT MEMBERSHIP:
I. FOUR VOTING MEMBERS REPRESENTING
GEOGRAPHIC REGIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES; AND
II. ONE AT LARGE VOTING MEMBER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH COMMISSION RULES.
3. THE COMMISSION MAY ADD OR REMOVE MEMBERS OF THE
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AS PROVIDED IN COMMISSION RULES.
4. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE
ANNUALLY.
5. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
A. RECOMMEND TO THE ENTIRE COMMISSION CHANGES TO
THE RULES OR BYLAWS, CHANGES TO THE COMPACT LEGISLATION, FEES PAID BY
INTERSTATE COMPACT MEMBER STATES SUCH AS ANNUAL DUES, AND ANY
COMPACT FEE CHARGED BY THE MEMBER STATES ON BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION.
B. ENSURE COMMISSION ADMINISTRATION SERVICES ARE
APPROPRIATELY PROVIDED, CONTRACTUAL OR OTHERWISE.
– 77 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. PREPARE AND RECOMMEND THE BUDGET.
D. MAINTAIN FINANCIAL RECORDS ON BEHALF OF THE
COMMISSION.
E. MONITOR COMPLIANCE OF MEMBER STATES AND PROVIDE
REPORTS TO THE COMMISSION.
F. PERFORM OTHER DUTIES AS PROVIDED IN RULES OR
BYLAWS.
6. MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION.
A. ALL MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, AND
PUBLIC NOTICE OF MEETINGS SHALL BE GIVEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION
BYLAWS.
B. THE COMMISSION OR THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR
OTHER COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MAY CONVENE IN A CLOSED,
NON–PUBLIC MEETING IF THE COMMISSION OR EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MUST DISCUSS:
I. NONCOMPLIANCE OF A MEMBER STATE WITH ITS
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE COMPACT.
II. THE EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE OR
OTHER MATTERS, PRACTICES OR PROCEDURES RELATED TO SPECIFIC EMPLOYEES
OR OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO THE COMMISSION’S INTERNAL PERSONNEL
PRACTICES AND PROCEDURES.
III. CURRENT, THREATENED, OR REASONABLY
ANTICIPATED LITIGATION.
IV. NEGOTIATION OF CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE,
LEASE, OR SALE OF GOODS, SERVICES, OR REAL ESTATE.
V. ACCUSING ANY PERSON OF A CRIME OR FORMALLY
CENSURING ANY PERSON.
VI. DISCLOSURE OF TRADE SECRETS OR COMMERCIAL
OR FINANCIAL INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL.
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
VII. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL
NATURE WHERE DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED
INVASION OF PERSONAL PRIVACY.
VIII. DISCLOSURE OF INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED
FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES.
IX. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION RELATED TO ANY
INVESTIGATIVE REPORTS PREPARED BY OR ON BEHALF OF OR FOR USE OF THE
COMMISSION OR OTHER COMMITTEE CHARGED WITH RESPONSIBILITY OF
INVESTIGATION OR DETERMINATION OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES PURSUANT TO THE
COMPACT.
X. MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM
DISCLOSURE BY FEDERAL OR MEMBER STATE STATUTE.
XI. OTHER MATTERS AS SET FORTH BY COMMISSION
BYLAWS AND RULES.
C. IF A MEETING, OR PORTION OF A MEETING, IS CLOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS PROVISION, THE COMMISSION’S LEGAL COUNSEL OR DESIGNEE
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE MEETING MAY BE CLOSED AND SHALL REFERENCE EACH
RELEVANT EXEMPTING PROVISION.
D. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES OF COMMISSION
MEETINGS AND SHALL PROVIDE A FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS
TAKEN, AND THE REASONS THEREFOR, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIEWS
EXPRESSED. ALL DOCUMENTS CONSIDERED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION
SHALL BE IDENTIFIED IN SUCH MINUTES. ALL MINUTES AND DOCUMENTS OF A
CLOSED MEETING SHALL REMAIN UNDER SEAL, SUBJECT TO RELEASE BY A
MAJORITY VOTE OF THE COMMISSION OR ORDER OF A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION.
7. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE
PAYMENT OF, THE REASONABLE EXPENSES OF ITS ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION,
AND ONGOING ACTIVITIES.
B. THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT ALL APPROPRIATE
DONATIONS AND GRANTS OF MONEY, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, MATERIALS, AND
SERVICES, AND RECEIVE, UTILIZE, AND DISPOSE OF THE SAME, PROVIDED THAT AT
– 79 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY OR
CONFLICT OF INTEREST.
C. THE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH MEMBER STATE OR IMPOSE FEES ON OTHER PARTIES TO
COVER THE COST OF THE OPERATIONS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE COMMISSION RULES.
D. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY
KIND PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME; NOR SHALL
THE COMMISSION PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY OF THE MEMBER STATES, EXCEPT
BY AND WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE MEMBER STATE.
E. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ACCURATE ACCOUNTS OF
ALL RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS. THE RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ACCOUNTING PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED
UNDER COMMISSION BYLAWS. ALL RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF FUNDS OF
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE REVIEWED ANNUALLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
COMMISSION BYLAWS, AND A REPORT OF THE REVIEW SHALL BE INCLUDED IN AND
BECOME PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION.
8. QUALIFIED IMMUNITY, DEFENSE, AND INDEMNIFICATION.
A. THE MEMBERS, OFFICERS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,
EMPLOYEES AND REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM
SUIT AND LIABILITY, EITHER PERSONALLY OR IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR
ANY CLAIM FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL INJURY OR
OTHER CIVIL LIABILITY CAUSED BY OR ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED
ACT, ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM
THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN
THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES;
PROVIDED THAT NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT
ANY SUCH PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR
LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF
THAT PERSON.
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND ANY MEMBER, OFFICER,
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, OR REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION IN
ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR
ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT THE PERSON
AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR
RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
PROHIBIT THAT PERSON FROM RETAINING HIS OR HER OWN COUNSEL; AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION
DID NOT RESULT FROM THAT PERSON’S INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON
MISCONDUCT.
C. THE COMMISSION SHALL INDEMNIFY AND HOLD HARMLESS
ANY MEMBER, OFFICER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, OR REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE COMMISSION FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT
OBTAINED AGAINST THAT PERSON ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION
EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSON HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE
ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM THE
INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT PERSON.
ARTICLE VIII. RULEMAKING.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL EXERCISE ITS RULEMAKING POWERS
PURSUANT TO THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT AND THE
RULES ADOPTED THEREUNDER. RULES AND AMENDMENTS SHALL BECOME
BINDING AS OF THE DATE SPECIFIED IN EACH RULE OR AMENDMENT.
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES TO
ACHIEVE THE INTENT AND PURPOSE OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT. IN THE EVENT
THE COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS
BEYOND PURPOSE AND INTENT OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS
GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW IN THE MEMBER STATES.
C. IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATURES OF THE MEMBER STATES
REJECTS A RULE, BY ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE OR RESOLUTION IN THE SAME
MANNER USED TO ADOPT THE COMPACT WITHIN FOUR (4) YEARS OF THE DATE OF
ADOPTION OF THE RULE, THEN SUCH RULE SHALL HAVE NO FURTHER FORCE AND
EFFECT IN ANY MEMBER STATE.
D. RULES OR AMENDMENTS TO THE RULES SHALL BE ADOPTED OR
RATIFIED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE COMMISSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES AND BYLAWS.
– 81 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
E. UPON DETERMINATION THAT AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER AND ADOPT AN EMERGENCY RULE WITH 48 HOURS’
NOTICE, WITH OPPORTUNITY TO COMMENT, PROVIDED THAT THE USUAL
RULEMAKING PROCEDURES SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY APPLIED TO THE RULE AS
SOON AS REASONABLY POSSIBLE, IN NO EVENT LATER THAN NINETY (90) DAYS
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE RULE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
PROVISION, AN EMERGENCY RULE IS ONE THAT MUST BE ADOPTED IMMEDIATELY
IN ORDER TO:
1. MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE;
2. PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR MEMBER STATE FUNDS;
3. MEET A DEADLINE FOR THE PROMULGATION OF AN
ADMINISTRATIVE RULE THAT IS ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL LAW OR RULE; OR
4. PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
ARTICLE IX. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE FOR FACILITATING THE EXCHANGE
OF INFORMATION TO ADMINISTER AND IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
COMPACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, CONSISTENT
WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED DATA PROTECTION PRINCIPLES.
B. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
ALTER, LIMIT, OR INHIBIT THE POWER OF A MEMBER STATE TO CONTROL AND
MAINTAIN OWNERSHIP OF ITS LICENSEE INFORMATION OR ALTER, LIMIT, OR
INHIBIT THE LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING LICENSEE INFORMATION IN THE
MEMBER STATE.
ARTICLE X. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT.
A. OVERSIGHT.
1. THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AND TAKE
ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO EFFECTUATE THE COMPACT’S
PURPOSES AND INTENT. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL HAVE
STANDING AS STATUTORY LAW.
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
2. VENUE IS PROPER AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY OR AGAINST
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE BROUGHT SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION IS
LOCATED. THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE VENUE AND JURISDICTIONAL DEFENSES
TO THE EXTENT IT ADOPTS OR CONSENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ALTERNATIVE
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEEDINGS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT OR LIMIT
THE SELECTION OR PROPRIETY OF VENUE IN ANY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE FOR
PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE, MISCONDUCT OR ANY SUCH SIMILAR MATTER.
3. ALL COURTS AND ALL ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCIES SHALL TAKE
JUDICIAL NOTICE OF THE COMPACT, THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, AND ANY
INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A MEMBER STATE PURSUANT THERETO IN ANY
JUDICIAL OR QUASI–JUDICIAL PROCEEDING IN A MEMBER STATE PERTAINING TO
THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THIS COMPACT, OR WHICH MAY AFFECT THE POWERS,
RESPONSIBILITIES, OR ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION.
4. THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY PROCEEDING REGARDING THE ENFORCEMENT OR
INTERPRETATION OF THE COMPACT AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO INTERVENE IN
SUCH A PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO PROVIDE THE COMMISSION
SERVICE OF PROCESS SHALL RENDER A JUDGMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE
COMMISSION, THIS COMPACT, OR PROMULGATED RULES.
B. DEFAULT, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND TERMINATION.
1. IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS
DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS COMPACT OR THE PROMULGATED RULES, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
A. PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE
AND OTHER MEMBER STATES OF THE NATURE OF THE DEFAULT, THE PROPOSED
MEANS OF CURING THE DEFAULT OR ANY OTHER ACTION TO BE TAKEN BY THE
COMMISSION; AND
B. PROVIDE REMEDIAL TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
C. IF A STATE IN DEFAULT FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE DEFAULTING
STATE MAY BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSIONERS OF THE MEMBER STATES, AND ALL RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES AND BENEFITS CONFERRED ON THAT STATE BY THIS COMPACT MAY BE
TERMINATED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT
– 83 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DOES NOT RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES
INCURRED DURING THE PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
D. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND OR TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY
THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF
THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY AND
EACH OF THE MEMBER STATES.
E. A STATE THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL
ASSESSMENTS, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS THAT EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
F. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATED TO A STATE
THAT IS FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED FROM THE
COMPACT, UNLESS AGREED UPON IN WRITING BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEFAULTING STATE.
G. THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE
COMMISSION BY PETITIONING THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF
SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
H. DISPUTE RESOLUTION.
1. UPON REQUEST BY A MEMBER STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE DISPUTES RELATED TO THE COMPACT THAT ARISE AMONG
MEMBER STATES AND BETWEEN MEMBER AND NON–MEMBER STATES.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE A RULE PROVIDING FOR
BOTH BINDING AND NON–BINDING ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR
DISPUTES AS APPROPRIATE.
I. ENFORCEMENT.
1. THE COMMISSION, IN THE REASONABLE EXERCISE OF ITS
DISCRETION, SHALL ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS AND RULES OF THIS COMPACT.
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
2. BY MAJORITY VOTE, THE COMMISSION MAY INITIATE LEGAL
ACTION IN THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES
AGAINST A MEMBER STATE IN DEFAULT TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS PROMULGATED RULES AND BYLAWS. THE
RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE
EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE
AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S
FEES. THE REMEDIES HEREIN MAY NOT BE THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE
COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY PURSUE ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE
UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
ARTICLE XI. EFFECTUATION, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT.
A. THE COMPACT SHALL COME INTO EFFECT ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPACT STATUTE IS ENACTED INTO LAW IN THE TENTH MEMBER STATE.
1. ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE AND REVIEW THE ENACTMENT OF EACH OF THE
CHARTER MEMBER STATES TO DETERMINE IF THE STATUTE ENACTED BY EACH
SUCH CHARTER MEMBER STATE IS MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL
COMPACT STATUTE.
2. A CHARTER MEMBER STATE WHOSE ENACTMENT IS FOUND TO BE
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO THE DEFAULT PROCESS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE X.
3. MEMBER STATES ENACTING THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
CHARTER MEMBER STATES SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN
ARTICLE VII.C.20 TO DETERMINE IF THEIR ENACTMENTS ARE MATERIALLY
DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE AND WHETHER THEY QUALIFY
FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
B. IF ANY MEMBER STATE IS LATER FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT, OR IS
TERMINATED OR WITHDRAWS FROM THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REMAIN IN EXISTENCE AND THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT EVEN IF THE
NUMBER OF MEMBER STATES SHOULD BE LESS THAN TEN.
C. ANY STATE THAT JOINS THE COMPACT AFTER THE COMMISSION’S
INITIAL ADOPTION OF THE RULES AND BYLAWS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE RULES
AND BYLAWS AS THEY EXIST ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW
IN THAT STATE. ANY RULE THAT HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FULL FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW ON THE DAY THE
– 85 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE, AS THE RULES AND BYLAWS MAY BE
AMENDED AS PROVIDED IN THIS COMPACT.
D. ANY MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THIS COMPACT BY
ENACTING A STATUTE REPEALING THE SAME.
1. A MEMBER STATE’S WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL
SIX (6) MONTHS AFTER ENACTMENT OF THE REPEALING STATUTE.
2. WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT AFFECT THE CONTINUING REQUIREMENT
OF THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY TO COMPLY WITH THE
INVESTIGATIVE AND ADVERSE ACTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT
PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF WITHDRAWAL.
E. THIS COMPACT MAY BE AMENDED BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO
AMENDMENT TO THIS COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
ANY MEMBER STATE UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO THE LAWS OF ALL MEMBER STATES.
ARTICLE XII. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
THIS COMPACT SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED TO EFFECTUATE THE
PURPOSES THEREOF. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE
AND IF ANY PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE, OR PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT IS
DECLARED TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE OR A
STATE SEEKING MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT, OR OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE
APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT, AGENCY, PERSON OR
CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID, THE VALIDITY OF THE REMAINDER OF THIS
COMPACT AND THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT, AGENCY,
PERSON, OR CIRCUMSTANCE MAY NOT BE AFFECTED THEREBY. IF THIS COMPACT
SHALL BE HELD CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE, THE
COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE REMAINING
MEMBER STATES AND IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE MEMBER STATE
AFFECTED AS TO ALL SEVERABLE MATTERS.
ARTICLE XIII. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS.
A. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL PREVENT OR INHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF
ANY OTHER LAW OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPACT.
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
B. ANY LAWS, STATUTES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER LEGAL
REQUIREMENTS IN A MEMBER STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
C. ALL PERMISSIBLE AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
MEMBER STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the State
Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to receive
– 87 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General Fund of
the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
7–108.
(a) In accordance with the Maryland Constitution and other law, the Governor
shall include in each budget bill:
(1) an appropriation to pay the principal of and interest on the State debt;
(2) without revision, the appropriations requested for public schools, as
certified by the State Superintendent of Schools;
(3) without revision, the appropriations requested for the Legislative
Branch of the State government, as certified by the presiding officers of the General
Assembly;
(4) without revision, the appropriations requested for the Judicial Branch
of the State government, as certified by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(5) the appropriations requested by the Governor for the Executive Branch
of the State government;
(6) the appropriations required by law to be included with the
appropriations for the Executive Branch;
(7) appropriations for the salaries required by law to be paid by the State;
[and]
(8) WITHOUT REVISION, APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE ACCOUNTABILITY
AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD, AS JOINTLY CERTIFIED BY THE PRESIDING
OFFICERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE GOVERNOR; AND
(9) any other appropriations required by the Maryland Constitution or other
law to be included in the budget bill.
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
(b) The Governor shall use the current salary plan of the Secretary of Budget and
Management as the basis for the appropriations to pay those salaries to which the plan
applies.
Chapter 717 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, and unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other
federal requirement, or with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, for fiscal years
2024 through 2028, net interest on all State money allocated by the State Treasurer under
§ 6–226 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to special funds or accounts, and
otherwise entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall
accrue to the General Fund of the State, with the exception of the following funds:
(85) the Bus Rapid Transit Fund; [and]
(86) the Transit–Oriented Development Capital Grant and Revolving Loan
Fund; AND
(87) THE ACADEMIC EXCELLENCE FUND.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–910.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Digital tool” means:
(i) An online platform;
(ii) An online course;
(iii) Information and communication technology services, including
software and operating systems, that are directly connected to student instruction;
(iv) Digital content; or
(v) Other digital technologies not requiring sight in an equally
effective and integrated manner.
– 89 –

Ch. 237 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A–1) BEGINNING WITH THE 2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR THROUGH THE
2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE PROCUREMENT
AND USE OF A DIGITAL TOOL THAT UTILIZES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AS DEFINED
IN § 3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, TO SUPPORT
STUDENT LEARNING.
SECTION 4. 3. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the State Department of Education, in
consultation with the Accountability and Implementation Board, shall contract with an
independent public or private entity to conduct a study of funding for special education in
the State.
(2) At a minimum, the study shall review and make recommendations on
the following:
(i) the costs of special education in the State;
(ii) the rising costs of special education for prekindergarten students
and the appropriate funding formula for those students assumed to be covered in the
prekindergarten per pupil funding allocation under the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future;
(iii) the implications of the design assumptions in the existing special
education funding structure related to long–term spending and costs;
(iv) the establishment of a system of multiple weights for special
education funding based on disability and level of services and support needed; and
(v) the feasibility of complying with the minimum school funding
requirement under § 5–234 of the Education Article as it relates to special education
funding.
(b) The entity conducting the study shall seek input from county boards of
education, nonpublic special education schools, special education advocates, and special
education organizations.
(c) The Governor shall include sufficient funds in the State budget for the
appropriate fiscal years for the State Department of Education to cover the costs of the
study.
(d) On or before December 15, 2026, the State Department of Education shall
report the findings and recommendations of the study to the General Assembly in
accordance with § § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 5. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act is
contingent on the enactment of substantially similar legislation in 10 other states. The
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 237
State Department of Education shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within
10 days after 10 states have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to Section 3 of
this Act it is the intent of the General Assembly that the State Department of Education
shall consult with the Maryland Center for Community Schools within Towson University
to:
(1) evaluate the Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program in
accordance with § 5–223(i)(4) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
and
(2) establish requirements for community school implementation plans in
accordance with § 9.9–104(b)(3) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the State Department of Education, after consulting with institutions of
higher education in the State with programs that conduct research regarding community
schools, shall:
(1) evaluate the Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program in
accordance with § 5–223(i)(4) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act;
and
(2) establish requirements for community school implementation plans in
accordance with § 9.9–104(b)(3) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) For fiscal year 2026 only, the State Department of Education shall provide
technical assistance to local education agencies to develop innovative models that can be
replicated for teacher collaboration at the school or local school system level that improve
teacher retention and student learning.
(b) (1) The Department is authorized to contract with an external partner that
has experience in innovative teacher collaboration models.
(2) The entity selected under this subsection shall support the Department
and may work directly with local school systems to develop their innovative models of teach
collaboration.
SECTION 6. 5. 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025. Section 4 of this Act shall remain
effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028, Section 4 of this Act, with
no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further
force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 91 –